Indiana, session 2026, SB174.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-10-8-10 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) The state shall
cover the testing required under IC 16-41-6-4 and the examinations
required under IC 16-41-17-2 under a:
(1) self-insurance program established or maintained under
section 7(b) of this chapter to provide group health coverage; and
(2) contract entered into or renewed under section 7(c) of this
chapter to provide health services through a prepaid health care
delivery plan.
(b) Payment to a hospital for a test required under IC 16-41-6-4
must be in an amount equal to the hospital's actual cost of performing
the test.
SECTION 2. IC 5-10-13-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.143-2021,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Except as provided in section 6 of this
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


chapter, An employee who:
(1) is diagnosed with a health condition caused by an exposure
risk disease that:
(A) requires medical treatment; and
(B) results in total or partial disability or death;
(2) by written affidavit has provided to the employee's employer
a verification described in subsection (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), or (g);
and
(3) before the employee is diagnosed with a health condition
caused by hepatitis or tuberculosis, tests negative for evidence of
hepatitis or tuberculosis through medical testing;
is presumed to have a disability or death incurred in the line of duty.
(b) This subsection applies to an employee who is diagnosed with
a health condition caused by hepatitis. If the health condition results in
disability or death and the employee wishes to have a presumption of
disability or death incurred in the line of duty apply to the employee,
the employee shall, by written affidavit executed before death, provide
verification that the employee has not:
(1) outside the scope of the employee's current employment, been
exposed through transfer of body fluids to an individual known to
have a medical condition caused by hepatitis;
(2) received blood products other than a transfusion received
because of an injury to the employee that occurred in the scope of
the employee's current employment;
(3) received blood products for the treatment of a coagulation
disorder since testing negative for hepatitis;
(4) engaged in sexual practices or other behavior identified as
high risk by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or the
Surgeon General of the United States;
(5) had sexual relations with another individual known to the
employee to have engaged in sexual practices or other behavior
described in subdivision (4); or
(6) used intravenous drugs that were not prescribed by a
physician.
(c) This subsection applies to an employee who is diagnosed with
a health condition caused by meningococcal meningitis. If the health
condition results in disability or death and the employee wishes to have
a presumption of disability or death incurred in the line of duty apply
to the employee, the employee shall, by written affidavit executed
before death, provide verification that the employee, in the ten (10)
days immediately preceding the diagnosis, was not exposed to another
individual known to:
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(1) have meningococcal meningitis; or
(2) be an asymptomatic carrier of meningococcal meningitis;
outside the scope of the employee's current employment.
(d) This subsection applies to an employee who is diagnosed with
a health condition caused by tuberculosis. If the health condition results
in disability or death and the employee wishes to have a presumption
of disability or death incurred in the line of duty apply to the employee,
the employee shall, by written affidavit executed before death, provide
verification that the employee has not, outside the scope of the
employee's current employment, been exposed to another individual
known to have tuberculosis.
(e) This subsection applies to an employee who is diagnosed with
a health condition caused by HIV. If the health condition results in
disability or death and the employee wishes to have a presumption of
disability or death incurred in the line of duty apply to the employee,
the employee shall, by written affidavit executed before death, provide
verification that the employee has not:
(1) outside the scope of the employee's current employment, been
exposed through transfer of body fluids to an individual known to
have a medical condition caused by HIV;
(2) received blood products other than a transfusion received
because of an injury to the employee that occurred in the scope of
the employee's current employment;
(3) received blood products for the treatment of a coagulation
disorder since testing negative for HIV;
(4) engaged in sexual practices or other behavior identified as
high risk by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or the
Surgeon General of the United States;
(5) had sexual relations with another individual known to the
employee to have engaged in sexual practices or other behavior
described in subdivision (4); or
(6) used intravenous drugs that were not prescribed by a
physician.
(f) This subsection applies to an employee who is diagnosed with a
health condition caused by smallpox. If the health condition results in
disability or death and the employee wishes to have a presumption of
disability or death incurred in the line of duty apply to the employee,
the employee shall, by written affidavit executed before death, provide
verification that the employee has not, outside the scope of the
employee's current employment, been exposed to another individual
known to have smallpox.
(g) This subsection applies to an employee who is diagnosed after
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


June 30, 2021, with a health condition caused by any variant of severe
acute respiratory syndrome (SARS), including coronavirus disease
(COVID-19). If the health condition results in disability or death and
the employee wishes to have a presumption of disability or death
incurred in the line of duty apply to the employee, the employee shall,
by written affidavit executed before death, provide verification that the
employee has not, outside the scope of the employee's current
employment, been exposed to another individual known to have any
variant of severe acute respiratory syndrome (SARS), including
coronavirus disease (COVID-19).
(h) A presumption of disability or death incurred in the line of duty
may be rebutted by competent evidence.
(i) A meeting or hearing held to rebut a presumption of disability or
death incurred in the line of duty may be held as an executive session
under IC 5-14-1.5-6.1(b)(1).
SECTION 3. IC 5-10-13-6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 6. If a standard, medically recognized vaccine or other
measure exists for the prevention of an exposure risk disease and the
vaccine or other measure is medically indicated for an employee
according to immunization policies established by the Advisory
Committee on Immunization Practices of the United States Public
Health Service, the following apply:
(1) If:
(A) the employee receives the vaccine or other measure as
required by the employee's employer; or
(B) the employee's physician provides written notice to the
employer that the vaccine or other measure would pose a
significant risk to the employee's health;
and the employee meets the other requirements of this chapter, a
presumption of disability or death incurred in the line of duty
under this chapter applies to the employee.
(2) If:
(A) the employee does not receive the vaccine or other
measure as required by the employee's employer; and
(B) the employee's physician has not provided written notice
that the vaccine or other measure would pose a significant risk
to the employee's health;
a presumption of disability or death incurred in the line of duty
under this chapter does not apply to the employee.
SECTION 4. IC 9-24-10-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.111-2021,
SECTION 59, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), an
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


examination for a learner's permit or driver's license must include the
following:
(1) A test of the following of the applicant:
(A) Eyesight.
(B) (A) Ability to read and understand highway signs
regulating, warning, and directing traffic.
(C) (B) Knowledge of Indiana traffic laws, including
IC 9-26-1-1.5 and IC 9-21-12-1.
(2) An actual demonstration of the applicant's skill in exercising
ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motor
vehicle under the type of permit or driver's license applied for.
(b) The examination may include further physical and mental
examination that the bureau finds necessary to determine the
applicant's fitness to operate a motor vehicle safely upon a highway.
The applicant must provide the motor vehicle used in the examination.
An autocycle may not be used as the motor vehicle provided for the
examination.
(c) The bureau may waive:
(1) the testing required under subsection (a)(1)(A) if the applicant
provides evidence from a licensed ophthalmologist or licensed
optometrist that the applicant's vision is fit to operate a motor
vehicle in a manner that does not jeopardize the safety of
individuals or property;
(2) (1) the actual demonstration required under subsection (a)(2)
for an individual who has passed:
(A) a driver's education class and a skills test given by a driver
training school;
(B) a driver education program given by an entity licensed
under IC 9-27; or
(C) a skills assessment conducted by a third party approved by
the bureau;
(3) (2) the testing other than eyesight testing under subsection
(a)(1)(A), of an applicant who has passed:
(A) an examination concerning:
(i) subsection (a)(1)(B); (a)(1)(A); and
(ii) subsection (a)(1)(C); (a)(1)(B); and
(B) a skills test;
given by a driver training school or an entity licensed under
IC 9-27; and
(4) (3) the testing other than the eyesight testing described in
subsection (a)(1)(A), of an applicant who:
(A) is at least eighteen (18) years of age;
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(B) was previously a nonresident but now qualifies as an
Indiana resident at the time of application; and
(C) holds a valid driver's license, excluding a learner's permit
or its equivalent, from the applicant's state of prior residence.
(d) The following are An instructor having a license under
IC 9-27-6-8 is not civilly or criminally liable for a report made in good
faith to the bureau, commission, or driver licensing medical advisory
board concerning the fitness of the applicant to operate a motor vehicle
in a manner that does not jeopardize the safety of individuals or
property.
(1) An instructor having a license under IC 9-27-6-8.
(2) A licensed ophthalmologist or licensed optometrist.
SECTION 5. IC 9-24-12-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.211-2023,
SECTION 46, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), and
subject to subsection (d), an individual applying for renewal of a
driver's license in the form of a physical credential (issued under
IC 9-24-3), or a chauffeur's or a public passenger chauffeur's license,
including any endorsements in effect with respect to the license, must
apply in person at a license branch and do the following:
(1) Pass an eyesight examination.
(2) pass a written examination if:
(A) (1) the applicant has at least six (6) active points on the
applicant's driving record maintained by the bureau;
(B) (2) the applicant has not reached the applicant's
twenty-first birthday and has active points on the applicant's
driving record maintained by the bureau; or
(C) (3) the applicant is in possession of a driver's license that
is expired beyond one hundred eighty (180) days.
(b) The holder of a driver's license in the form of a physical
credential (issued under IC 9-24-3), a chauffeur's or a public passenger
chauffeur's license, or a learner's permit issued in the form of a physical
credential under IC 9-24-7 may renew the license, including any
endorsements in effect with respect to the license, by mail or by
electronic service, subject to the following conditions:
(1) A valid computerized image of the individual must exist
within the records of the bureau.
(2) The previous renewal of the individual's driver's license
(issued under IC 9-24-3), chauffeur's or public passenger
chauffeur's license, or a learner's permit issued under IC 9-24-7
must not have been by mail or by electronic service.
(3) The application for or previous renewal of the individual's
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


license or permit must have included a test of the individual's
eyesight approved by the bureau.
(4) (3) If the individual were applying for the license or permit
renewal in person at a license branch, the individual would not be
required under subsection (a)(2) (a) to submit to a written
examination.
(5) (4) The individual must be a citizen of the United States, as
shown in the records of the bureau.
(6) (5) There must not have been any change in the:
(A) address; or
(B) name;
of the individual since the issuance or previous renewal of the
individual's driver's license (issued under IC 9-24-3), chauffeur's
or public passenger chauffeur's license, or a learner's permit
issued under IC 9-24-7.
(7) (6) The driver's license (issued under IC 9-24-3), chauffeur's
or public passenger chauffeur's license, or a learner's permit
issued under IC 9-24-7 of the individual must not be:
(A) suspended; or
(B) expired more than one hundred eighty (180) days;
at the time of the application for renewal.
(8) If the individual is seventy-five (75) years of age or older at
the time of the application for renewal, the individual must
provide proof, on a form approved by the bureau, that the
individual has passed an eyesight examination within thirty (30)
days prior to the renewal application.
(c) An individual applying for the renewal of a driver's license
issued in the form of a physical credential (issued under IC 9-24-3), a
chauffeur's license or a public passenger chauffeur's license, or a
learner's permit issued in the form of a physical credential under
IC 9-24-7, including any endorsements in effect with respect to the
license, must apply in person at a license branch under subsection (a)
if the individual is not entitled to apply by mail or by electronic service
under subsection (b).
(d) The bureau may not issue or renew a chauffeur's or a public
passenger chauffeur's license after December 31, 2016. If a holder of
a chauffeur's or a public passenger chauffeur's license applies after
December 31, 2016, for renewal of the chauffeur's or public passenger
chauffeur's license, the bureau shall issue to the holder a driver's
license under IC 9-24-3 with a for-hire endorsement if the holder:
(1) applies in a form and manner prescribed by the bureau; and
(2) satisfies the requirements for renewal of a driver's license
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


issued under IC 9-24-3, including the fee and examination
requirements under this section.
(e) An individual applying for the renewal of a driver's license
issued in the form of a physical credential under IC 9-24-3 shall pay the
following applicable fee:
(1) If the individual is less than seventy-five (75) years of age,
seventeen dollars and fifty cents ($17.50). The fee shall be
distributed as follows:
(A) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(B) Two dollars ($2) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(C) Four dollars and fifty cents ($4.50) to the motor vehicle
highway account.
(D) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety communications fund.
(E) Nine dollars and twenty-five cents ($9.25) to the
commission fund.
(2) If the individual is at least seventy-five (75) years of age and
less than eighty-five (85) years of age, eleven dollars ($11). The
fee shall be distributed as follows:
(A) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(B) One dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) to the crossroads 2000
fund.
(C) Three dollars ($3) to the motor vehicle highway account.
(D) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety communications fund.
(E) Four dollars and seventy-five cents ($4.75) to the
commission fund.
(3) If the individual is at least eighty-five (85) years of age, seven
dollars ($7). The fee shall be distributed as follows:
(A) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(B) One dollar ($1) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(C) Two dollars ($2) to the motor vehicle highway account.
(D) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety communications fund.
(E) Two dollars and twenty-five cents ($2.25) to the
commission fund.
A fee paid under this subsection after December 31, 2016, includes the
renewal of any endorsements that are in effect with respect to the
driver's license issued in the form of a physical credential under
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


IC 9-24-3 at the time of renewal.
SECTION 6. IC 10-14-3-23 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 23. This chapter may
not be construed to compel a person, either on behalf of:
(1) the person;
(2) the person's child less than eighteen (18) years of age; or
(3) a protected person for whom the person acts as a guardian;
to submit to any physical examination, medical treatment, or
immunization. if the person, parent, or guardian relies in good faith on
spiritual means or prayer to prevent or cure disease or suffering and
objects to the treatment in writing.
SECTION 7. IC 12-15-15-4.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 4.5. Payment to a hospital for a test required under
IC 16-41-6-4 must be in an amount equal to the hospital's actual cost
of performing the test and may not reduce or replace the reimbursement
of other services that are provided to the patient under the state
Medicaid program. The total cost to the state may not be more than
twenty-four thousand dollars ($24,000) in a state fiscal year.
SECTION 8. IC 12-17.2-2-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 171, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The division shall perform the
following duties:
(1) Administer the licensing and monitoring of child care centers
or child care homes in accordance with this article.
(2) Ensure that a national criminal history background check of
the following is completed through the state police department
under IC 10-13-3-39 before issuing a license:
(A) An applicant for a license.
(B) An employee or volunteer of an applicant who may be
present on the premises of the child care center or child care
home during the operating hours of the child care center or
child care home.
(C) If an applicant is applying for a license to operate a child
care home, the following:
(i) The applicant's spouse.
(ii) The applicant's household members who are at least
eighteen (18) years of age or who are less than eighteen (18)
years of age but have previously been waived from juvenile
court to adult court.
(3) Ensure that a national criminal history background check of
the following is completed through the state police department
under IC 10-13-3-39 before registering a child care ministry:
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(A) An applicant for a child care ministry registration.
(B) An employee or volunteer of an applicant who may be
present on the premises of the child care ministry during the
operating hours of the child care ministry.
(4) Provide for the issuance, denial, suspension, and revocation of
licenses.
(5) Cooperate with governing bodies of child care centers and
child care homes and their staffs to improve standards of child
care.
(6) Prepare at least biannually a directory of licensees with a
description of the program capacity and type of children served
that will be distributed to the legislature, licensees, and other
interested parties as a public document.
(7) Deposit all license application fees collected under section 2
of this chapter in the division of family resources child care fund
established by section 3 of this chapter.
(8) Require each child care center or child care home to record
proof of a child's date of birth before accepting the child. A child's
date of birth may be proven by the child's original birth certificate
or other reliable proof of the child's date of birth, including a duly
attested transcript of a birth certificate.
(9) Provide a website through which members of the public may
obtain the following information:
(A) Information concerning violations of this article by a
licensed child care provider, including:
(i) the identity of the child care provider;
(ii) the date of the violation; and
(iii) action taken by the division in response to the violation.
(B) Current status of a child care provider's license.
(C) Other relevant information.
The website may not contain the address of a child care home or
information identifying an individual child. However, the website
may include the county and ZIP code in which a child care home
is located.
(10) Provide or approve training concerning safe sleeping
practices for children to:
(A) a provider who operates a child care program in the
provider's home as described in IC 12-17.2-3.5-12.5;
(B) a child care home licensed under IC 12-17.2-5;
(C) a child care center licensed under IC 12-17.2-4; and
(D) a child care ministry registered under IC 12-17.2-6;
including practices to reduce the risk of sudden infant death
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


syndrome.
(11) Publish the information received from each licensed child
care center under IC 12-17.2-4-18.2 on the division's website.
SECTION 9. IC 12-17.2-3.5-11.1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 11.1. (a) After December 31, 2002, a provider
shall maintain and annually update documentation provided by the
physician of each child who is cared for in a facility where the provider
operates a child care program that the child has received complete age
appropriate immunizations, including:
(1) conjugated pneumococcal vaccine; and
(2) varicella vaccine or a demonstrated immunity to varicella.
The Indiana department of health shall determine for each age level the
immunizations that constitute complete age appropriate immunizations.
(b) A provider meets the requirement of subsection (a) if:
(1) a child's parent:
(A) objects to immunizations for religious reasons; and
(B) provides documentation of the parent's objection;
(2) the child's physician provides documentation of a medical
reason the child should not be immunized; or
(3) the child's physician provides documentation that the child is
currently in the process of receiving complete age appropriate
immunizations;
and the provider maintains and annually updates the documentation
provided by the parent or physician under this subsection.
SECTION 10. IC 12-17.2-4-18.1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 18.1. (a) After December 31, 2002, a licensee
shall maintain and annually update documentation provided by the
physician of each child who is cared for in a child care center where the
licensee provides child care that the child has received complete age
appropriate immunizations, including:
(1) conjugated pneumococcal vaccine; and
(2) varicella vaccine or a demonstrated immunity to varicella.
The Indiana department of health shall determine for each age level the
immunizations that constitute complete age appropriate immunizations.
(b) A licensee meets the requirement of subsection (a) if:
(1) a child's parent:
(A) objects to immunizations for religious reasons; and
(B) provides documentation of the parent's objection;
(2) the child's physician provides documentation of a medical
reason the child should not be immunized; or
(3) the child's physician provides documentation that the child is
currently in the process of receiving complete age appropriate
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


immunizations;
and the licensee maintains and annually updates the documentation
provided by the parent or physician under this subsection.
SECTION 11. IC 12-17.2-4-18.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 18.2. A licensee shall report to the
division the ingredients in each food product provided to a child
enrolled at the child care center.
SECTION 12. IC 12-17.2-5-18.1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 18.1. (a) After December 31, 2002, a licensee
shall maintain and annually update documentation provided by the
physician of each child who is cared for in a child care home where the
licensee provides child care that the child has received complete age
appropriate immunizations, including:
(1) conjugated pneumococcal vaccine; and
(2) varicella vaccine or a demonstrated immunity to varicella.
The Indiana department of health shall determine for each age level the
immunizations that constitute complete age appropriate immunizations.
(b) A licensee meets the requirement of subsection (a) if:
(1) a child's parent:
(A) objects to immunizations for religious reasons; and
(B) provides documentation of the parent's objection;
(2) the child's physician provides documentation of a medical
reason the child should not be immunized; or
(3) the child's physician provides documentation that the child is
currently in the process of receiving complete age appropriate
immunizations;
and the licensee maintains and annually updates the documentation
provided by the parent or physician under this subsection.
SECTION 13. IC 12-17.2-6-11 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 11. (a) The parent or guardian of a child shall, when the
child is enrolled in a child care ministry, provide the child care ministry
with proof that the child has received the required immunizations
against the following:
(1) Diphtheria.
(2) Whooping cough.
(3) Tetanus.
(4) Measles.
(5) Rubella.
(6) Poliomyelitis.
(7) Mumps.
(b) A child enrolled in a child care ministry may not be required to
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


undergo an immunization required under this section if the parents
object for religious reasons. The objection must be:
(1) made in writing;
(2) signed by the child's parent or guardian; and
(3) delivered to the child care ministry.
(c) If a physician certifies that a particular immunization required
by this section is or may be detrimental to the child's health, the
requirements of this section for that particular immunization are
inapplicable to that child until the immunization is found to be no
longer detrimental to the child's health.
SECTION 14. IC 13-18-16-17 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) As used in this section,
"public water supply" means a system that:
(1) is for the provision to the public of water for human
consumption through pipes or other constructed conveyances;
and
(2) either:
(A) has at least fifteen (15) service connections; or
(B) regularly serves an average of at least twenty-five (25)
individuals daily at least sixty (60) days out of the year.
(b) A person may not add a chemical to a public water supply if
the primary purpose of adding the chemical is to affect human
health.
(c) This section does not prohibit a person from adding a
chemical to a public water supply for the purpose of purifying the
public water supply.
SECTION 15. IC 16-18-2-23 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 23. "Approved laboratory", for purposes of IC 16-41-6
and IC 16-41-15, has the meaning set forth in IC 16-41-15-1.
SECTION 16. IC 16-18-2-68.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 68.8. "Conscience", for purposes
of IC 16-18-5, has the meaning set forth in IC 16-18-5-1.
SECTION 17. IC 16-18-2-79.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.164-2023,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 79.5. "Core public health services" means basic
services provided by local health departments or through local health
department contracts or grants with an entity, including the following:
(1) Food protection under IC 16-20-8 and IC 16-42-5.
(2) Communicable disease prevention and control under
IC 16-20-1 and IC 16-41.
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(3) Screening and case management for childhood lead exposure
and poisoning under IC 16-41-39.4.
(4) Pest and vector control and abatement under IC 16-41-33 and
IC 16-41-34.
(5) Inspection and testing of public and semipublic pools under
rules adopted by the state department in accordance with
IC 16-19-3-4.
(6) Residential onsite sewage system permitting and inspections
under IC 13-26-5 and IC 16-41-25.
(7) Orders for the decontamination of property used to illegally
manufacture a controlled substance under IC 16-19-3.1 and
IC 16-41-20.
(8) Sanitary inspections and surveys of public buildings under
IC 16-20-1-22.
(9) Sanitary operation of tattoo parlors and body piercing facilities
under rules adopted by the state department under
IC 16-19-3-4(c).
(10) Sanitary operations of facilities where eyelash extensions are
applied under rules adopted by the state department under
IC 16-19-3-4.5.
(11) Vital statistics under IC 16-20-1-17.
(12) Access to childhood and adult immunizations, including
immunizations required under IC 16-41-19.
(13) Tobacco prevention and cessation, including education on
vaping and smoking cessation for youth and pregnant women.
(14) Partnering with schools and school nurses to support student
health, including the following:
(A) evidence based education on nutrition and physical
activity.
(B) Hearing screenings under IC 20-34-3-14, vision screenings
under IC 20-34-3-12, and oral health screenings.
(15) Child fatality review under IC 16-49-2.
(16) Suicide and overdose fatality review under IC 16-49.5-2.
(17) Maternal and child health.
(18) Testing and counseling for HIV, hepatitis C, and other
sexually transmitted infections, in accordance with IC 20-30-5-13.
(19) Health promotion and education for preventing trauma and
injury, including safe sleep, child safety car seats, and bicycle
helmets for children.
(20) Tuberculosis control and case management.
(21) Emergency preparedness.
(22) Referrals to clinical care, including:
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(A) health screenings;
(B) prenatal care; and
(C) substance use disorder treatment.
(23) The prevention and reduction of chronic illnesses, including
the following:
(A) Obesity.
(B) Diabetes.
(C) Cardiovascular diseases, including hypertension and
hyperlipidemia.
(D) Hepatitis C.
(E) Cancer.
SECTION 18. IC 16-18-2-160.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.3-2008,
SECTION 107, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 160.5. (a) "Health care entity",
for purposes of IC 16-18-5, has the meaning set forth in
IC 16-18-5-2.
(b) "Health care entity", for purposes of IC 16-41-42.1, has the
meaning set forth in IC 16-41-42.1-1.
SECTION 19. IC 16-18-2-163, AS AMENDED BY
P.L.179-2022(ss), SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 163. (a) Except as
provided in subsection (c), "health care provider", for purposes of
IC 16-21 and IC 16-41, means any of the following:
(1) An individual, a partnership, a corporation, a professional
corporation, a facility, or an institution licensed or legally
authorized by this state to provide health care or professional
services as a licensed physician, a psychiatric hospital, a hospital,
a health facility, an emergency ambulance service (IC 16-31-3),
a dentist, a registered or licensed practical nurse, a midwife, an
optometrist, a pharmacist, a podiatrist, a chiropractor, a physical
therapist, a respiratory care practitioner, an occupational therapist,
a psychologist, a paramedic, an emergency medical technician, an
advanced emergency medical technician, an athletic trainer, or a
person who is an officer, employee, or agent of the individual,
partnership, corporation, professional corporation, facility, or
institution acting in the course and scope of the person's
employment.
(2) A college, university, or junior college that provides health
care to a student, a faculty member, or an employee, and the
governing board or a person who is an officer, employee, or agent
of the college, university, or junior college acting in the course
and scope of the person's employment.
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(3) A blood bank, community mental health center, community
intellectual disability center, community health center, or migrant
health center.
(4) A home health agency (as defined in IC 16-27-1-2).
(5) A health maintenance organization (as defined in
IC 27-13-1-19).
(6) A health care organization whose members, shareholders, or
partners are health care providers under subdivision (1).
(7) A corporation, partnership, or professional corporation not
otherwise qualified under this subsection that:
(A) provides health care as one (1) of the corporation's,
partnership's, or professional corporation's functions;
(B) is organized or registered under state law; and
(C) is determined to be eligible for coverage as a health care
provider under IC 34-18 for the corporation's, partnership's, or
professional corporation's health care function.
Coverage for a health care provider qualified under this subdivision is
limited to the health care provider's health care functions and does not
extend to other causes of action.
(b) "Health care provider", for purposes of IC 16-35, has the
meaning set forth in subsection (a). However, for purposes of IC 16-35,
the term also includes a health facility (as defined in section 167 of this
chapter).
(c) "Health care provider", for purposes of IC 16-32-5, IC 16-36-5,
IC 16-36-6, and IC 16-41-10 means an individual licensed or
authorized by this state to provide health care or professional services
as:
(1) a licensed physician;
(2) a registered nurse;
(3) a licensed practical nurse;
(4) an advanced practice registered nurse;
(5) a certified nurse midwife;
(6) a paramedic;
(7) an emergency medical technician;
(8) an advanced emergency medical technician;
(9) an emergency medical responder, as defined by section 109.8
of this chapter;
(10) a licensed dentist;
(11) a home health aide, as defined by section 174 of this chapter;
or
(12) a licensed physician assistant.
The term includes an individual who is an employee or agent of a
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


health care provider acting in the course and scope of the individual's
employment.
(d) "Health care provider", for purposes of IC 16-36-7, has the
meaning set forth in IC 16-36-7-12.
(e) "Health care provider", for purposes of IC 16-40-4, means any
of the following:
(1) An individual, a partnership, a corporation, a professional
corporation, a facility, or an institution licensed or authorized by
the state to provide health care or professional services as a
licensed physician, a psychiatric hospital, a hospital, a health
facility, an emergency ambulance service (IC 16-31-3), an
ambulatory outpatient surgical center, a dentist, an optometrist, a
pharmacist, a podiatrist, a chiropractor, a psychologist, or a
person who is an officer, employee, or agent of the individual,
partnership, corporation, professional corporation, facility, or
institution acting in the course and scope of the person's
employment.
(2) A blood bank, laboratory, community mental health center,
community intellectual disability center, community health
center, or migrant health center.
(3) A home health agency (as defined in IC 16-27-1-2).
(4) A health maintenance organization (as defined in
IC 27-13-1-19).
(5) A health care organization whose members, shareholders, or
partners are health care providers under subdivision (1).
(6) A corporation, partnership, or professional corporation not
otherwise specified in this subsection that:
(A) provides health care as one (1) of the corporation's,
partnership's, or professional corporation's functions;
(B) is organized or registered under state law; and
(C) is determined to be eligible for coverage as a health care
provider under IC 34-18 for the corporation's, partnership's, or
professional corporation's health care function.
(7) A person that is designated to maintain the records of a person
described in subdivisions (1) through (6).
(f) "Health care provider", for purposes of IC 16-45-4, has the
meaning set forth in 47 CFR 54.601(a).
(g) "Health care provider", for purposes of IC 16-18-5, has the
meaning set forth in IC 16-18-5-3.
SECTION 20. IC 16-18-2-163.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 163.7. "Health care service", for
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


purposes of IC 16-18-5, has the meaning set forth in IC 16-18-5-4.
SECTION 21. IC 16-18-2-223.7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 223.7. "Medically contraindicated", for purposes
of IC 16-28-14 and IC 16-28-14.5, means that a vaccine would be
detrimental to an individual's health because of a medical condition of
the individual.
SECTION 22. IC 16-18-5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 5. Health Care Freedom of Conscience
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "conscience" means religious,
moral, or ethical beliefs or principles.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "health care entity" means an
entity, a partnership, a corporation, a professional corporation, a
facility, or an institution licensed or legally authorized by this state
to provide a health care service.
Sec. 3. (a) As used in this chapter, "health care provider" means
an individual licensed or authorized by this state to provide health
care services.
(b) The term includes an individual who is an employee or agent
of a health care provider acting in the course and scope of the
individual's employment.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "health care service" means any
health care related service, treatment, or procedure to maintain,
diagnose, or treat an individual's physical or mental condition.
Sec. 5. (a) A health care provider may not be required to:
(1) perform;
(2) provide;
(3) participate in; or
(4) refer an individual for;
a health care service that violates the health care provider's
conscience.
(b) A health care provider may not be subject to any of the
following for declining to perform, provide, participate in, or refer
an individual for a health care service described in subsection (a):
(1) Discrimination, including denial of, revocation of, or
disqualification for:
(A) licensure, staff privileges, board certification, or career
specialty;
(B) a grant, contract, or other program; or
(C) a residency or other training opportunity.
(2) Adverse employment action, including termination of
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


employment, transfer, demotion, reassignment to a different
shift, or loss or reduction of wages or benefits.
(3) Adverse administrative action.
(4) Disciplinary or retaliatory action.
(5) Criminal, administrative, or civil liability.
Sec. 6. (a) A health care entity may not be required to perform,
provide, participate in, or refer an individual for a health care
service that violates the health care entity's conscience, as
determined by the entity's existing or proposed:
(1) guidelines;
(2) mission statement;
(3) constitution;
(4) bylaws;
(5) articles of incorporation;
(6) regulations; or
(7) other documents.
(b) A health care entity that:
(1) declines to perform, provide, participate in, or refer an
individual for a health care service described in subsection
(a);
(2) discloses to the patient, in writing, that the health care
entity reserves the right to decline to perform, provide,
participate in, or refer the patient for a health care service
that violates the health care entity's conscience; and
(3) obtains written consent from the patient before the patient
is admitted to the health care entity's facility;
may not be criminally prosecuted or held administratively or
civilly liable for refusing to perform, provide, participate in, or
refer the patient for the health care service.
(c) A health care entity or a prospective health care entity may
not be subject to any of the following for declining to perform,
provide, participate in, or refer an individual for a health care
service described in subsection (a):
(1) Discrimination.
(2) Denial of, revocation of, or disqualification for:
(A) licensure;
(B) staff privileges;
(C) a grant; or
(D) any form of aid, assistance, benefit, or privilege.
(3) Denial of authorization to establish, expand, improve,
acquire, affiliate, or merge with the health care entity.
Sec. 7. (a) A person injured by a violation of this chapter may
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


bring an action against the person that violated this chapter.
(b) It is not a defense in an action under this chapter that a
violation was necessary to prevent additional burden or expense on
a health care provider, a health care entity, an individual, or a
patient.
(c) A person whose rights have been violated by a violation of
this chapter may assert the violation or impending violation as a
claim or defense in a judicial, administrative, or other proceeding.
Sec. 8. A prevailing plaintiff in an action brought under section
7 of this chapter is entitled to the following:
(1) Injunctive relief.
(2) The greater of:
(A) an amount not to exceed three (3) times the actual
damages sustained; or
(B) liquidated damages of five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(3) Court costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
(4) Any other appropriate relief determined by the court.
SECTION 23. IC 16-21-7-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.112-2020,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. With the approval of the budget director and
upon the recommendation of the budget committee, each county that
has incurred costs for an individual with a communicable disease
under:
(1) IC 16-41-1;
(2) IC 16-41-2;
(3) IC 16-41-3;
(4) IC 16-41-5;
(5) (4) IC 16-41-6;
(6) (5) IC 16-41-7;
(7) (6) IC 16-41-8;
(8) (7) IC 16-41-9; or
(9) (8) IC 16-41-13;
is entitled to a pro rata share of the money remaining at the end of the
state fiscal year in the fund established under this chapter.
SECTION 24. IC 16-28-14 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Patient Immunizations).
SECTION 25. IC 16-28-14.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. (Health Facility Employee Immunizations).
SECTION 26. IC 16-38-5-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.45-2020,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The state department shall maintain an
immunization data registry to collect, store, analyze, release, and report
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


immunization data.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), data in the immunization
data registry may be used only for the following purposes:
(1) To assure that necessary immunizations are provided and
overimmunization is avoided.
(2) To assess immunization coverage rates.
(3) To determine areas of underimmunization and other
epidemiological research for disease control purposes.
(4) To document that required immunizations have been provided
as required for school or child care admission.
(5) (4) To accomplish other public health purposes as determined
by the state department.
(c) The immunization data registry may be used to store and release
other nonimmunization personal health information maintained by the
state department, including blood lead screening and newborn
screening information, so providers and the individual may access the
health information. However, section 3 of this chapter does not apply
to the release of nonimmunization personal health information.
Nonimmunization personal health information may be released only in
accordance with state and federal laws concerning that personal health
information.
(d) The state department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
concerning who may input and retrieve information from the
immunization data registry.
SECTION 27. IC 16-41-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Communicable Disease: Investigation by Health Officers;
Examination of Individuals With Communicable Disease).
SECTION 28. IC 16-41-6-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.112-2020,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) As used in this section, "physician's
authorized representative" means:
(1) an advanced practice registered nurse (as defined by
IC 25-23-1-1(b)) who is operating in collaboration with a licensed
physician; or
(2) an individual acting under the supervision of a licensed
physician and within the individual's scope of employment.
(b) A physician or the physician's authorized representative shall not
order an HIV test on an individual under the care of a physician unless
the physician or the physician's authorized representative does the
following:
(1) Informs the patient of the test, orally or in writing.
(2) Provides the patient with an explanation of the test orally, in
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


writing, by video, or by a combination of these methods.
(3) Informs the patient of the patient's right to ask questions and
to refuse the test.
Subject to subsection (e), If the patient refuses the test, the physician
or the physician's authorized representative may not perform the test
and shall document the patient's refusal in the patient's medical record.
(c) Unless it is clearly not feasible, the information delivered to the
patient who is to be tested under subsection (b) must be provided in the
native language or other communication used by the patient. If the
patient is unable to read written materials, the materials must be
translated or read to the patient in a language the patient understands.
(d) After ordering an HIV test for a patient, the physician or the
physician's authorized representative shall notify the patient of the test
results and the availability of HIV and other bloodborne disease
prevention counseling. If a test conducted under this section indicates
that a patient is HIV positive, in addition to the requirements set forth
in IC 16-41-2, the physician or the physician's authorized
representative shall inform the patient of the availability of counseling
and of the treatment and referral options available to the patient.
(e) A physician or a physician's authorized representative may order
an HIV test to be performed without informing the patient or the
patient's representative (as defined in IC 16-36-1-2) of the test or
regardless of the patient's or the patient's representative's refusal of the
HIV test if any of the following conditions apply:
(1) If ordered by a physician, consent can be implied due to
emergency circumstances and the test is medically necessary to
diagnose or treat the patient's emergent condition.
(2) Under a court order based on clear and convincing evidence
of a serious and present health threat to others posed by an
individual. A patient shall be notified of the patient's right to:
(A) a hearing; and
(B) counsel;
before a hearing is held under this subdivision. Any hearing
conducted under this subdivision shall be held in camera at the
request of the individual.
(3) If the test is done on blood collected or tested anonymously as
part of an epidemiologic survey under IC 16-41-2-3 or
IC 16-41-17-10(a)(5).
(4) The test is ordered under section 4 of this chapter.
(5) The test is required or authorized under IC 11-10-3-2.5.
(6) The individual upon whom the test will be performed is
described in IC 16-41-8-6 or IC 16-41-10-2.5.
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(7) A court has ordered the individual to undergo testing for HIV
under IC 35-38-1-10.5(a) or IC 35-38-2-2.3(a)(17).
(f) (e) The state department shall make HIV testing and treatment
information from the federal Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention available to health care providers.
(g) (f) The state department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
necessary to implement this section.
SECTION 29. IC 16-41-6-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.112-2020,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) As used in this section, "informed consent"
means authorization for a physical examination, made without undue
inducement or any form of force, fraud, constraint, deceit, duress, or
coercion after the following:
(1) A fair explanation of the examination, including the purpose,
potential uses, limitations, and the fair meaning of the
examination results.
(2) A fair explanation of the procedures to be followed, including
the following:
(A) The voluntary nature of the examination.
(B) The right to withdraw consent to the examination process
at any time.
(C) The right to anonymity to the extent provided by law with
respect to participation in the examination and disclosure of
examination results.
(D) The right to confidential treatment to the extent provided
by law of information identifying the subject of the
examination and the results of the examination.
(b) If the state health commissioner, the state health commissioner's
legally authorized agent, or local health official has reasonable grounds
to believe that an individual may have a communicable disease or other
disease that poses a serious health risk, the state health commissioner,
the state health commissioner's legally authorized agent, or local health
officer may ask the individual for written informed consent to be
examined to prevent the transmission of the disease to other
individuals.
(c) If the individual, when requested, refuses such an examination,
the state health commissioner, the state health commissioner's legally
authorized agent, or local health officer may not compel the
examination. only upon a court order based on clear and convincing
evidence of a serious and present health threat to others posed by the
individual.
(d) A hearing held under this section shall be held in camera at the
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


request of the individual.
SECTION 30. IC 16-41-6-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 3. (a) Except as otherwise provided, a person who
recklessly violates or fails to comply with this chapter commits a Class
B misdemeanor.
(b) Each day a violation continues constitutes a separate offense.
SECTION 31. IC 16-41-6-4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 4. (a) Subject to subsection (f), if:
(1) the mother of a newborn infant has not had a test performed
under section 5 or 6 of this chapter;
(2) the mother of a newborn infant has refused a test for the
newborn infant to detect HIV or the antibody or antigen to HIV;
and
(3) a physician believes that testing the newborn infant is
medically necessary;
the physician overseeing the care of the newborn infant may order a
confidential test for the newborn infant in order to detect HIV or the
antibody or antigen to HIV. The test must be ordered at the earliest
feasible time not exceeding forty-eight (48) hours after the birth of the
infant.
(b) If the physician orders a test under subsection (a), the physician
must:
(1) notify the mother of the newborn infant of the test; and
(2) provide HIV information and counseling to the mother. The
information and counseling must include the following:
(A) The purpose of the test.
(B) The risks and benefits of the test.
(C) A description of the methods of HIV transmission.
(D) A discussion of risk reduction behavior modifications,
including methods to reduce the risk of perinatal HIV
transmission and HIV transmission through breast milk.
(E) Referral information to other HIV prevention, health care,
and psychosocial services.
(c) The confidentiality provisions of IC 16-41-2-3 apply to this
section.
(d) The results of the confidential test ordered under subsection (a)
must be released to the mother of the newborn infant.
(e) If a test ordered under subsection (a) is positive, the person who
provides the results of the test shall inform the mother of the newborn
infant of treatment options or referral options available to the newborn
infant.
(f) If a parent of the newborn infant objects in writing for reasons
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


pertaining to religious beliefs, the newborn infant is exempt from the
test under subsection (a).
(g) The state department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to carry
out this section.
(h) The results of a test performed under this section are
confidential.
(i) The state department shall apply for funds under Section 2625 of
the Ryan White CARE Amendments of 1996 (42 U.S.C. 300ff-21 et
seq.) to pay for all tests conducted under subsection (a).
SECTION 32. IC 16-41-6-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 5. (a) This section applies to:
(1) a physician licensed under IC 25-22.5; or
(2) an advanced practice registered nurse licensed under
IC 25-23;
who provides prenatal care within the scope of the provider's license.
(b) Subject to section 8 of this chapter, an individual described in
subsection (a) who:
(1) diagnoses the pregnancy of a woman; or
(2) is primarily responsible for providing prenatal care to a
pregnant woman;
shall order to be taken a sample of the pregnant woman's blood and
shall submit the sample to an approved laboratory for a standard
licensed diagnostic test for HIV.
SECTION 33. IC 16-41-6-6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 6. Subject to section 8 of this chapter, if, at the time of
delivery, there is no written evidence that a standard licensed
diagnostic test for HIV has been performed under section 5 of this
chapter, the physician or advanced practice registered nurse in
attendance at the delivery shall order to be taken a sample of the
woman's blood at the time of the delivery and shall submit the sample
to an approved laboratory for a standard licensed diagnostic test for
HIV.
SECTION 34. IC 16-41-6-7 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. A pregnant woman
has a right to refuse a test under section 5 or 6 of this chapter. standard
licensed diagnostic test for HIV.
SECTION 35. IC 16-41-6-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.129-2018,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) This section applies to a physician or an
advanced practice registered nurse who orders an HIV test under
section 5 or 6 of this chapter or to the physician's or nurse's designee.
(b) An individual described in subsection (a) shall:
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(1) inform the pregnant woman that:
(A) the individual is required by law to order an HIV test
unless the pregnant woman refuses; and
(B) the pregnant woman has a right to refuse the test; and
(2) explain to the pregnant woman:
(A) the purpose of the test; and
(B) the risks and benefits of the test.
(c) An individual described in subsection (a) shall document in the
pregnant woman's medical records that the pregnant woman received
the information required under subsection (b).
(d) If a pregnant woman refuses to consent to an HIV test, the
refusal must be noted by an individual described in subsection (a) in
the pregnant woman's medical records.
(e) If a test ordered under section 5 or 6 of this chapter is positive,
an individual described in subsection (a):
(1) shall inform the pregnant woman of the test results;
(2) shall inform the pregnant woman of the treatment options or
referral options available to the pregnant woman; and
(3) shall:
(A) provide the pregnant woman with a description of the
methods of HIV transmission;
(B) discuss risk reduction behavior modifications with the
pregnant woman, including methods to reduce the risk of
perinatal HIV transmission and HIV transmission through
breast milk; and
(C) provide the pregnant woman with referral information to
other HIV prevention, health care, and psychosocial services.
(f) The provisions of IC 16-41-2-3 apply to a positive HIV test under
section 5 or 6 of this chapter.
(g) The results of a test performed under section 5 or 6 of this
chapter are confidential.
(h) As a routine component of prenatal care, every individual
described in subsection (a) a physician or an advanced practice
registered nurse is required to provide information and counseling
regarding HIV and the standard licensed diagnostic test for HIV and to
offer and recommend the standard licensed diagnostic test for HIV.
(i) An individual described in subsection (a) shall document:
(1) the oral or written consent of the pregnant woman to be tested;
and
(2) that the pregnant woman was counseled and provided the
required information set forth in subsection (b) to ensure that an
informed decision has been made.
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(j) A pregnant woman who refuses a test under this section must do
so in writing.
SECTION 36. IC 16-41-6-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.112-2020,
SECTION 21, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) The state department shall adopt rules
under IC 4-22-2 that include procedures:
(1) to inform the woman of the test results under this chapter,
whether they are positive or negative;
(2) for explaining the side effects of any treatment for HIV if the
test results under this chapter are positive; and
(3) to establish a process for a woman who tests positive under
this chapter to appeal the woman's status on a waiting list on a
treatment program for which the woman is eligible. The rule
must:
(A) include a requirement that the state department make a
determination in the process described in this subdivision not
later than seventy-two (72) hours after the state department
receives all the requested medical information; and
(B) set forth the necessary medical information that must be
provided to the state department and reviewed by the state
department in the process described in this subdivision.
(b) The state department shall maintain rules under IC 4-22-2 that
set forth standards to provide to women who are pregnant, before
delivery, at delivery, and after delivery, information concerning HIV.
The rules must include:
(1) an explanation of the nature of AIDS and HIV;
(2) information concerning discrimination and legal protections;
(3) information concerning the duty to notify persons at risk as
described in IC 16-41-7-1;
(4) information about risk behaviors for HIV transmission;
(5) information about the risk of transmission through breast
feeding;
(6) notification that if the woman chooses not to be tested for HIV
before delivery, at delivery the child will be tested subject to
section 4 of this chapter;
(7) (6) procedures for obtaining informed, written consent for
testing under this chapter;
(8) (7) procedures for post-test counseling by a health care
provider when the test results are communicated to the woman,
whether the results are positive or negative;
(9) (8) procedures for referral for physical and emotional services
if the test results are positive;
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(10) (9) procedures for explaining the importance of immediate
entry into medical care if the test results are positive; and
(11) (10) procedures for explaining that the use of antiretroviral
drugs and other medical interventions lessen the likelihood of
transmitting HIV to the child during childbirth.
SECTION 37. IC 16-41-6-13 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. (a) Women who:
(1) meet all qualifications to participate in the children's health
insurance program, the AIDS drug assistance program, the health
insurance assistance program, or any other health care program of
the state; and
(2) test positive under section 5 or 6 of this chapter; on a
standard licensed diagnostic test for HIV;
shall be given first priority on a waiting list for the program if a waiting
list exists. If a program does not have a waiting list, the woman
described in this subsection shall be automatically approved and
accepted into the program.
(b) If the state department determines during the process described
in section 11(a)(3) of this chapter that the treatment of a woman who
tests positive under this chapter should not be interrupted because of
medical necessity, the woman may enter a program described in
subsection (a) regardless of the existence of a waiting list for the
program.
SECTION 38. IC 16-41-7-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2023,
SECTION 158, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A licensed physician who
diagnoses, treats, or counsels a patient with a serious communicable
disease shall inform the patient of the patient's duty under section 1 of
this chapter.
(b) A physician described in subsection (a) may notify the
following:
(1) A health officer if the physician has reasonable cause to
believe that a patient:
(A) is a serious and present risk to the health of others as
described in section 2(a) of this chapter;
(B) has engaged in noncompliant behavior; or
(C) is suspected of being a person at risk (as defined in section
1 of this chapter).
(2) A person at risk (as defined in section 1 of this chapter) or a
person legally responsible for the patient if the physician:
(A) has medical verification that the patient is an individual
with a communicable disease;
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(B) knows the identity of the person at risk;
(C) has a reasonable belief of a significant risk of harm to the
identified person at risk;
(D) has reason to believe the identified person at risk has not
been informed and will not be informed of the risk by the
patient or another person; and
(E) has made reasonable efforts to inform the individual with
a communicable disease of the physician's intent to make or
cause the state department to make a disclosure to the person
at risk.
(c) A physician who notifies a person at risk under this section shall
do the following:
(1) Identify the serious communicable disease.
(2) Inform the person of available health care measures such as
counseling and testing.
(d) A physician who in good faith provides notification under this
section is not subject to liability in a civil, an administrative, a
disciplinary, or a criminal action.
(e) A patient's privilege with respect to a physician under
IC 34-46-3-1 is waived regarding:
(1) notification under subsection (b); and
(2) information provided about a patient's noncompliant behavior
in an investigation or action under this chapter, IC 16-41-2,
IC 16-41-3, IC 16-41-5, IC 16-41-6, IC 16-41-8, IC 16-41-9,
IC 16-41-13, IC 16-41-14, and IC 16-41-16.
(f) A physician's immunity from liability under subsection (d)
applies only to the provision of information reasonably calculated to
protect an identified person who is at epidemiological risk of infection.
(g) A physician who notifies a person under this section is also
required to satisfy the reporting requirements under IC 16-41-2-2
through IC 16-41-2-8.
SECTION 39. IC 16-41-7-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.112-2020,
SECTION 25, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) As used in this section, "person at risk"
means an individual who in the best judgment of a licensed physician:
(1) has engaged in high risk activity (as defined in section 1 of
this chapter); or
(2) is in imminent risk of engaging in high risk activity (as
defined in section 1 of this chapter).
(b) If a health officer is notified in writing by a physician under
section 3(b)(1)(A) of this chapter of a patient:
(1) for whom the physician has medical verification that the
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


patient is an individual with a communicable disease; and
(2) who, in the best judgment of the physician, is a serious and
present risk to the health of others;
the health officer shall make an investigation of the individual with a
communicable disease as authorized in IC 16-41-5-2 to determine
whether the environmental conditions surrounding the individual with
a communicable disease or the conduct of the individual with a
communicable disease requires the intervention by the health officer or
designated health official to prevent the transmission of disease to
others.
(c) If the state department is requested in writing by a physician who
has complied with the requirements of section 3(b)(2) of this chapter
to notify a person at risk, the state department shall notify the person
at risk unless, in the opinion of the state department, the person at risk:
(1) has already been notified;
(2) will be notified; or
(3) will otherwise be made aware that the person is a person at
risk.
(d) The state department shall establish a confidential registry of all
persons submitting written requests under subsection (c).
(e) The state department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this section. Local health officers may submit advisory
guidelines to the state department to implement this chapter,
IC 16-41-1, IC 16-41-3, IC 16-41-5, IC 16-41-8, or IC 16-41-9. The
state department shall fully consider such advisory guidelines before
adopting a rule under IC 4-22-2-29 implementing this chapter,
IC 16-41-1, IC 16-41-3, IC 16-41-5, IC 16-41-8, or IC 16-41-9.
SECTION 40. IC 16-41-8-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 5. (a) This section does not apply to medical testing of an
individual for whom an indictment or information is filed for a sex
crime and for whom a request to have the individual tested under
section 6 of this chapter is filed.
(b) The following definitions apply throughout this section:
(1) "Bodily fluid" means blood, human waste, or any other bodily
fluid.
(2) "Serious disease" means any of the following:
(A) Chancroid.
(B) Chlamydia.
(C) Gonorrhea.
(D) Hepatitis.
(E) Human immunodeficiency virus (HIV).
(F) Lymphogranuloma venereum.
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(G) Syphilis.
(H) Tuberculosis.
(3) "Offense involving the transmission of a bodily fluid" means
any offense (including a delinquent act that would be a crime if
committed by an adult) in which a bodily fluid is transmitted from
the defendant to the victim in connection with the commission of
the offense.
(c) This subsection applies only to a defendant who has been
charged with a potentially disease transmitting offense. At the request
of an alleged victim of the offense, the parent, guardian, or custodian
of an alleged victim who is less than eighteen (18) years of age, or the
parent, guardian, or custodian of an alleged victim who is an
endangered adult (as defined in IC 12-10-3-2), the prosecuting attorney
shall petition a court to order a defendant charged with the commission
of a potentially disease transmitting offense to submit to a screening
test to determine whether the defendant is infected with a serious
disease. In the petition, the prosecuting attorney must set forth
information demonstrating that the defendant has committed a
potentially disease transmitting offense. The court shall set the matter
for hearing not later than forty-eight (48) hours after the prosecuting
attorney files a petition under this subsection. The alleged victim, the
parent, guardian, or custodian of an alleged victim who is less than
eighteen (18) years of age, and the parent, guardian, or custodian of an
alleged victim who is an endangered adult (as defined in IC 12-10-3-2)
are entitled to receive notice of the hearing and are entitled to attend
the hearing. The defendant and the defendant's counsel are entitled to
receive notice of the hearing and are entitled to attend the hearing. If,
following the hearing, the court finds probable cause to believe that the
defendant has committed a potentially disease transmitting offense, the
court may order the defendant to submit to a screening test for one (1)
or more serious diseases. The court shall take actions to ensure the
confidentiality of evidence introduced at the hearing.
(d) This subsection applies only to a defendant who has been
charged with an offense involving the transmission of a bodily fluid. At
the request of an alleged victim of the offense, the parent, guardian, or
custodian of an alleged victim who is less than eighteen (18) years of
age, or the parent, guardian, or custodian of an alleged victim who is
an endangered adult (as defined in IC 12-10-3-2), the prosecuting
attorney shall petition a court to order a defendant charged with the
commission of an offense involving the transmission of a bodily fluid
to submit to a screening test to determine whether the defendant is
infected with a serious disease. In the petition, the prosecuting attorney
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


must set forth information demonstrating that:
(1) the defendant has committed an offense; and
(2) a bodily fluid was transmitted from the defendant to the victim
in connection with the commission of the offense.
The court shall set the matter for hearing not later than forty-eight (48)
hours after the prosecuting attorney files a petition under this
subsection. The alleged victim of the offense, the parent, guardian, or
custodian of an alleged victim who is less than eighteen (18) years of
age, and the parent, guardian, or custodian of an alleged victim who is
an endangered adult (as defined in IC 12-10-3-2) are entitled to receive
notice of the hearing and are entitled to attend the hearing. The
defendant and the defendant's counsel are entitled to receive notice of
the hearing and are entitled to attend the hearing. If, following the
hearing, the court finds probable cause to believe that the defendant has
committed an offense and that a bodily fluid was transmitted from the
defendant to the alleged victim in connection with the commission of
the offense, the court may order the defendant to submit to a screening
test for one (1) or more serious diseases. The court shall take actions to
ensure the confidentiality of evidence introduced at the hearing.
(e) The testimonial privileges applying to communication between
a husband and wife and between a health care provider and the health
care provider's patient are not sufficient grounds for not testifying or
providing other information at a hearing conducted in accordance with
this section.
(f) A health care provider (as defined in IC 16-18-2-163) who
discloses information that must be disclosed to comply with this
section is immune from civil and criminal liability under Indiana
statutes that protect patient privacy and confidentiality.
(g) The results of a screening test conducted under this section shall
be kept confidential if the defendant ordered to submit to the screening
test under this section has not been convicted of the potentially disease
transmitting offense or offense involving the transmission of a bodily
fluid with which the defendant is charged. The results may not be made
available to any person or public or private agency other than the
following:
(1) The defendant and the defendant's counsel.
(2) The prosecuting attorney.
(3) The department of correction or the penal facility, juvenile
detention facility, or secure private facility where the defendant
is housed.
(4) The alleged victim or the parent, guardian, or custodian of an
alleged victim who is less than eighteen (18) years of age, or the
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


parent, guardian, or custodian of an alleged victim who is an
endangered adult (as defined in IC 12-10-3-2), and the alleged
victim's counsel.
The results of a screening test conducted under this section may not be
admitted against a defendant in a criminal proceeding or against a child
in a juvenile delinquency proceeding.
(h) As soon as practicable after a screening test ordered under this
section has been conducted, the alleged victim or the parent, guardian,
or custodian of an alleged victim who is less than eighteen (18) years
of age, or the parent, guardian, or custodian of an alleged victim who
is an endangered adult (as defined in IC 12-10-3-2), and the victim's
counsel shall be notified of the results of the test.
(i) An alleged victim may disclose the results of a screening test to
which a defendant is ordered to submit under this section to an
individual or organization to protect the health and safety of or to seek
compensation for:
(1) the alleged victim;
(2) the alleged victim's sexual partner; or
(3) the alleged victim's family.
(j) The court shall order a petition filed and any order entered under
this section sealed.
(k) A person that knowingly or intentionally:
(1) receives notification or disclosure of the results of a screening
test under this section; and
(2) discloses the results of the screening test in violation of this
section;
commits a Class B misdemeanor.
SECTION 41. IC 16-41-8-6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 6. (a) If an indictment or information alleges that the
defendant compelled another person to engage in sexual activity by
force or threat of force, the alleged victim of the offense described in
the indictment or information may request that the defendant against
whom the indictment or information is filed be tested for the human
immunodeficiency virus (HIV).
(b) Not later than forty-eight (48) hours after an alleged victim
described in subsection (a) requests that the defendant be tested for the
human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), the defendant must be tested for
the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV).
(c) As soon as practicable, the results of a test for the human
immunodeficiency virus (HIV) conducted under subsection (b) shall be
sent to:
(1) the alleged victim;
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(2) the parent or guardian of the alleged victim, if the alleged
victim is less than eighteen (18) years of age; and
(3) the defendant.
(d) If follow-up testing of the defendant for the human
immunodeficiency virus (HIV) is necessary, the results of follow-up
testing of the defendant shall be sent to:
(1) the alleged victim;
(2) the parent or guardian of the alleged victim if the alleged
victim is less than eighteen (18) years of age; and
(3) the defendant.
SECTION 42. IC 16-41-9-1.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 1.5. (a) If a public health authority has reason to believe
that:
(1) an individual:
(A) has been infected with; or
(B) has been exposed to;
a serious communicable disease or outbreak; and
(2) the individual is likely to cause the infection of an uninfected
individual if the individual is not restricted in the individual's
ability to come into contact with an uninfected individual;
the public health authority may petition a circuit or superior court for
an order imposing isolation or quarantine on the individual. A petition
for isolation or quarantine filed under this subsection must be verified
and include a brief description of the facts supporting the public health
authority's belief that isolation or quarantine should be imposed on an
individual, including a description of any efforts the public health
authority made to obtain the individual's voluntary compliance with
isolation or quarantine before filing the petition.
(b) Except as provided in subsections (e) and (k), an individual
described in subsection (a) is entitled to notice and an opportunity to
be heard, in person or by counsel, before a court issues an order
imposing isolation or quarantine. A court may restrict an individual's
right to appear in person if the court finds that the individual's personal
appearance is likely to expose an uninfected person to a serious
communicable disease or outbreak.
(c) If an individual is restricted from appearing in person under
subsection (b), the court shall hold the hearing in a manner that allows
all parties to fully and safely participate in the proceedings under the
circumstances.
(d) If the public health authority proves by clear and convincing
evidence that:
(1) an individual has been infected or exposed to a serious
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


communicable disease or outbreak; and
(2) the individual is likely to cause the infection of an uninfected
individual if the individual is not restricted in the individual's
ability to come into contact with an uninfected individual;
the court may issue an order imposing isolation or quarantine on the
individual. The court shall establish the conditions of isolation or
quarantine, including the duration of isolation or quarantine. The court
shall impose the least restrictive conditions of isolation or quarantine
that are consistent with the protection of the public.
(e) If the public health authority has reason to believe that an
individual described in subsection (a) is likely to expose an uninfected
individual to a serious communicable disease or outbreak before the
individual described in subsection (a) can be provided with notice and
an opportunity to be heard, the public health authority may seek in a
circuit or superior court an emergency order of quarantine or isolation
by filing a verified petition for emergency quarantine or isolation. The
verified petition must include a brief description of the facts supporting
the public health authority's belief that:
(1) isolation or quarantine should be imposed on an individual;
and
(2) the individual described in subsection (a) may expose an
uninfected individual to a serious communicable disease or
outbreak before the individual described in subsection (a) can be
provided with notice and an opportunity to be heard.
The verified petition must include a description of any efforts the
public health authority made to obtain the individual's voluntary
compliance with isolation or quarantine before filing the petition.
(f) If the public health authority proves by clear and convincing
evidence that:
(1) an individual has been infected or exposed to a serious
communicable disease or outbreak;
(2) the individual is likely to cause the infection of an uninfected
individual if the individual is not restricted in the individual's
ability to come into contact with an uninfected individual; and
(3) the individual may expose an uninfected individual to a
serious communicable disease or outbreak before the individual
can be provided with notice and an opportunity to be heard;
the court may issue an emergency order imposing isolation or
quarantine on the individual. The court shall establish the duration and
other conditions of isolation or quarantine. The court shall impose the
least restrictive conditions of isolation or quarantine that are consistent
with the protection of the public.
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(g) A court may issue an emergency order of isolation or quarantine
without the verified petition required under subsection (e) if the court
receives sworn testimony of the same facts required in the verified
petition:
(1) in a nonadversarial, recorded hearing before the judge;
(2) orally by telephone or radio;
(3) in writing by facsimile transmission (fax); or
(4) through other electronic means approved by the court.
If the court agrees to issue an emergency order of isolation or
quarantine based upon information received under subdivision (2), the
court shall direct the public health authority to sign the judge's name
and to write the time and date of issuance on the proposed emergency
order. If the court agrees to issue an emergency order of isolation or
quarantine based upon information received under subdivision (3), the
court shall direct the public health authority to transmit a proposed
emergency order to the court, which the court shall sign, add the date
of issuance, and transmit back to the public health authority. A court
may modify the conditions of a proposed emergency order.
(h) If an emergency order of isolation or quarantine is issued under
subsection (g)(2), the court shall record the conversation on audiotape
and order the court reporter to type or transcribe the recording for entry
in the record. The court shall certify the audiotape, the transcription,
and the order retained by the judge for entry in the record.
(i) If an emergency order of isolation or quarantine is issued under
subsection (g)(3), the court shall order the court reporter to retype or
copy the facsimile transmission for entry in the record. The court shall
certify the transcription or copy and order retained by the judge for
entry in the record.
(j) The clerk shall notify the public health authority who received an
emergency order under subsection (g)(2) or (g)(3) when the
transcription or copy required under this section is entered in the
record. The public health authority shall sign the typed, transcribed, or
copied entry upon receiving notice from the court reporter.
(k) The public health authority may issue an immediate order
imposing isolation or quarantine on an individual if exigent
circumstances, including the number of affected individuals, exist that
make it impracticable for the public health authority to seek an order
from a court, and obtaining the individual's voluntary compliance is or
has proven impracticable or ineffective. An immediate order of
isolation or quarantine expires after seventy-two (72) hours, excluding
Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, unless renewed in accordance
with subsection (l). The public health authority shall establish the other
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


conditions of isolation or quarantine. The public health authority shall
impose the least restrictive conditions of isolation or quarantine that are
consistent with the protection of the public. If the immediate order
applies to a group of individuals and it is impracticable to provide
individual notice, the public health authority shall post a copy of the
order where it is likely to be seen by individuals subject to the order.
(l) The public health authority may seek to renew an order of
isolation or quarantine or an immediate order of isolation or quarantine
issued under this section by doing the following:
(1) By filing a petition to renew the emergency order of isolation
or quarantine or the immediate order of isolation or quarantine
with:
(A) the court that granted the emergency order of isolation or
quarantine; or
(B) a circuit or superior court, in the case of an immediate
order.
The petition for renewal must include a brief description of the
facts supporting the public health authority's belief that the
individual who is the subject of the petition should remain in
isolation or quarantine and a description of any efforts the public
health authority made to obtain the individual's voluntary
compliance with isolation or quarantine before filing the petition.
(2) By providing the individual who is the subject of the
emergency order of isolation or quarantine or the immediate order
of isolation or quarantine with a copy of the petition and notice of
the hearing at least twenty-four (24) hours before the time of the
hearing.
(3) By informing the individual who is the subject of the
emergency order of isolation or quarantine or the immediate order
of isolation or quarantine that the individual has the right to:
(A) appear, unless the court finds that the individual's personal
appearance may expose an uninfected person to a serious
communicable disease or outbreak;
(B) cross-examine witnesses; and
(C) counsel, including court appointed counsel in accordance
with subsection (c).
(4) If:
(A) the petition applies to a group of individuals; and
(B) it is impracticable to provide individual notice;
by posting the petition in a conspicuous location on the isolation
or quarantine premises.
(m) If the public health authority proves by clear and convincing
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


evidence at a hearing under subsection (l) that:
(1) an individual has been infected or exposed to a serious
communicable disease or outbreak; and
(2) the individual is likely to cause the infection of an uninfected
individual if the individual is not restricted in the individual's
ability to come into contact with an uninfected individual;
the court may renew the existing order of isolation or quarantine or
issue a new order imposing isolation or quarantine on the individual.
The court shall establish the conditions of isolation or quarantine,
including the duration of isolation or quarantine. The court shall
impose the least restrictive conditions of isolation or quarantine that are
consistent with the protection of the public.
(n) Unless otherwise provided by law, a petition for isolation or
quarantine, or a petition to renew an immediate order for isolation or
quarantine, may be filed in a circuit or superior court in any county.
Preferred venue for a petition described in this subsection is:
(1) the county or counties (if the area of isolation or quarantine
includes more than one (1) county) where the individual,
premises, or location to be isolated or quarantined is located; or
(2) a county adjacent to the county or counties (if the area of
isolation or quarantine includes more than one (1) county) where
the individual, premises, or location to be isolated or quarantined
is located.
This subsection does not preclude a change of venue for good cause
shown.
(o) Upon the motion of any party, or upon its own motion, a court
may consolidate cases for a hearing under this section if:
(1) the number of individuals who may be subject to isolation or
quarantine, or who are subject to isolation or quarantine, is so
large as to render individual participation impractical;
(2) the law and the facts concerning the individuals are similar;
and
(3) the individuals have similar rights at issue.
A court may appoint an attorney to represent a group of similarly
situated individuals if the individuals can be adequately represented.
An individual may retain his or her own counsel or proceed pro se.
(p) A public health authority that imposes a quarantine that is not in
the person's home:
(1) shall allow the parent or guardian of a child who is
quarantined under this section; and
(2) may allow an adult;
to remain with the quarantined individual in quarantine. As a condition
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


of remaining with the quarantined individual, the public health
authority may require a person described in subdivision (2) who has not
been exposed to a serious communicable disease to receive an
immunization or treatment for the disease or condition, if an
immunization or treatment is available and if requiring immunization
or treatment does not violate a constitutional right.
(q) If an individual who is quarantined under this section is the sole
parent or guardian of one (1) or more children who are not quarantined,
the child or children shall be placed in the residence of a relative,
friend, or neighbor of the quarantined individual until the quarantine
period has expired. Placement under this subsection must be in
accordance with the directives of the parent or guardian, if possible.
(r) State and local law enforcement agencies shall cooperate with
the public health authority in enforcing an order of isolation or
quarantine.
(s) The court shall appoint an attorney to represent an indigent
individual in an action brought under this chapter or under IC 16-41-6.
If funds to pay for the court appointed attorney are not available from
any other source, the state department may use the proceeds of a grant
or loan to reimburse the county, state, or attorney for the costs of
representation.
(t) A person who knowingly or intentionally violates a condition of
isolation or quarantine under this chapter commits violating quarantine
or isolation, a Class A misdemeanor.
(u) The state department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this section, including rules to establish guidelines for:
(1) voluntary compliance with isolation and quarantine;
(2) quarantine locations and logistical support; and
(3) moving individuals to and from a quarantine location.
The absence of rules adopted under this subsection does not preclude
the public health authority from implementing any provision of this
section.
SECTION 43. IC 16-41-9-1.6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2007,
SECTION 138, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.6. (a) A public health authority
may impose or petition a court to impose a quarantine and do the
following:
(1) Distribute information to the public concerning:
(A) the risks of the disease;
(B) how the disease is transmitted;
(C) available precautions to reduce the risk of contracting the
disease;
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(D) the symptoms of the disease; and
(E) available medical or nonmedical treatments available for
the disease.
(2) Instruct the public concerning social distancing.
(3) Request that the public inform the public health authority or
a law enforcement agency if a family member contracts the
disease.
(4) Instruct the public on self quarantine and provide a distinctive
means of identifying a home that is self quarantined.
(5) Instruct the public on the use of masks, gloves, disinfectant,
and other means of reducing exposure to the disease.
(6) Close schools, athletic events, and other nonessential
situations in which people gather.
If a quarantine is imposed under section 1.5 of this chapter, the public
health authority shall ensure that, to the extent possible, quarantined
individuals have sufficient supplies to remain in their own home.
(b) If an out of home, nonhospital quarantine is imposed on an
individual, the individual shall be housed as close as possible to the
individual's residence.
(c) In exercising the powers described in this section or in section
1.5 of this chapter, the public health authority may not prohibit a
person lawfully permitted to possess a firearm from possessing one (1)
or more firearms unless the person is quarantined in a mass quarantine
location. The public health authority may not remove a firearm from
the person's home, even if the person is quarantined in a mass
quarantine location.
(d) (b) This section does not prohibit a public health authority from
adopting rules and enforcing rules to implement this section if the rules
are not inconsistent with this section.
SECTION 44. IC 16-41-9-1.7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.112-2020,
SECTION 32, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.7. (a) An immunization program established by
a public health authority to combat a public health emergency
involving a serious communicable disease must comply with the
following:
(1) The state department must develop and distribute or post
information concerning the risks and benefits of immunization.
(2) No person may be required to receive an immunization
without that person's consent. No child may be required to receive
an immunization without the consent of the child's parent,
guardian, or custodian. The state department may implement the
procedures described in section 1.5 of this chapter concerning a
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


person who refuses to receive an immunization or the child of a
parent, guardian, or custodian who refuses to consent to the child
receiving an immunization.
(b) The state department shall adopt rules to implement this section.
The absence of rules adopted under this subsection does not preclude
the public health authority from implementing any provision of this
section.
SECTION 45. IC 16-41-9-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 3. (a) The local health officer may exclude from school a
student who has a serious communicable disease that:
(1) is transmissible through normal school contacts; and
(2) poses a substantial threat to the health and safety of the school
community.
(b) If the local health officer subsequently determines that a student
who has been excluded from school under subsection (a) does not have
a serious communicable disease that:
(1) is transmissible through normal school contacts; and
(2) poses a substantial threat to the health and safety of the school
community;
the local health officer shall issue a certificate of health to admit or
readmit the student to school.
(c) A person who objects to the determination made by the local
health officer under this section may appeal to the executive board of
the state department, which is the ultimate authority. IC 4-21.5 applies
to proceedings under this section.
SECTION 46. IC 16-41-9-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 5. (a) If a designated health official determines that an
individual with a communicable disease has a serious communicable
disease and has reasonable grounds to believe that the individual with
a communicable disease is mentally ill and either dangerous or gravely
disabled, the designated health official may request emergency
detention under IC 12-26-5 for the purpose of having the individual
with a communicable disease apprehended, detained, and examined.
The designated health official may provide to the superintendent of the
psychiatric hospital or center or the attending physician information
about the communicable disease status of the individual with a
communicable disease. Communications under this subsection do not
constitute a breach of confidentiality.
(b) If the application for detention required under IC 12-26-5 states
there is probable cause to believe the individual with a communicable
disease is mentally ill and either dangerous or gravely disabled and
requires continuing care and treatment, proceedings may continue
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


under IC 12-26.
(c) If the court does not approve an application for detention
required under IC 12-26-5, or if an application for detention is not
timely filed, the individual with a communicable disease shall be
referred to the designated health official who may take action under
this article.
SECTION 47. IC 16-41-9-6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 6. (a) The chief medical officer of a hospital or other
institutional facility may direct that an individual with a communicable
disease detained under this article be placed apart from the others and
restrained from leaving the facility. An individual with a
communicable disease detained under this article shall observe all the
rules of the facility or is subject to further action before the committing
court.
(b) An individual with a communicable disease detained under this
article who leaves a tuberculosis hospital or other institutional facility
without being authorized to leave or who fails to return from an
authorized leave without having been formally discharged is
considered absent without leave.
(c) The sheriff of the county in which an individual with a
communicable disease referred to in subsection (b) is found shall
apprehend the individual with a communicable disease and return the
individual with a communicable disease to the facility at which the
individual with a communicable disease was being detained upon
written request of the superintendent of the facility. Expenses incurred
under this section are treated as expenses described in section 13 of
this chapter.
SECTION 48. IC 16-41-9-7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 7. (a) An individual with a communicable disease who:
(1) poses a serious and present risk to the health of others;
(2) has been voluntarily admitted to a hospital or other facility for
the treatment of tuberculosis or another serious communicable
disease; and
(3) who leaves the facility without authorized leave or against
medical advice or who fails to return from authorized leave;
shall be reported to a health officer by the facility not more than
twenty-four (24) hours after discovery of the individual with a
communicable disease's absence.
(b) If a health officer fails or refuses to institute or complete
necessary legal measures to prevent a health threat (as defined in
IC 16-41-7-2) by the individual with a communicable disease, the case
shall be referred to a designated health official for appropriate action
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


under this article.
SECTION 49. IC 16-41-9-8 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 8. (a) A local health officer may file a report with the court
that states that an individual with a communicable disease who has
been detained under this article may be discharged without danger to
the health or life of others.
(b) The court may enter an order of release based on information
presented by the local health officer or other sources.
SECTION 50. IC 16-41-9-10 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 10. (a) The administrator of a hospital or other facility
for the treatment of tuberculosis or other serious communicable disease
may transfer or authorize the transfer of a nonresident indigent
individual with a communicable disease to the state or county of legal
residence of the individual with a communicable disease if the
individual with a communicable disease is able to travel. If the
individual with a communicable disease is unable to travel, the
administrator may have the individual with a communicable disease
hospitalized until the individual with a communicable disease is able
to travel.
(b) Costs for the travel and hospitalization authorized by this section
shall be paid by the:
(1) individual with a communicable disease under section 13 of
this chapter; or
(2) state department if the individual with a communicable
disease cannot pay the full cost.
SECTION 51. IC 16-41-9-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.112-2020,
SECTION 40, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) The superintendent or the chief executive
officer of the facility to which an individual with a communicable
disease has been ordered under this chapter may decline to admit a
patient if the superintendent or chief executive officer determines that
there is not available adequate space, treatment staff, or treatment
facilities appropriate to the needs of the patient.
(b) (a) The state department may commence an action under
IC 4-21.5-3-6 or IC 4-21.5-4 for issuance of an order of compliance and
a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per
violation per day against a person who:
(1) fails to comply with IC 16-41-1 through IC 16-41-3,
IC 16-41-5 IC 16-41-6 through IC 16-41-9, IC 16-41-13,
IC 16-41-14, or IC 16-41-16 or a rule adopted under these
chapters; or
(2) interferes with or obstructs the state department or the state
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


department's designated agent in the performance of official
duties under IC 16-41-1 through IC 16-41-3, IC 16-41-5
IC 16-41-6 through IC 16-41-9, IC 16-41-13, IC 16-41-14, or
IC 16-41-16 or a rule adopted under these chapters.
(c) (b) The state department may commence an action against a
facility licensed by the state department under either subsection (b) or
the licensure statute for that facility. but the state department may not
bring an action arising out of one (1) incident under both statutes.
SECTION 52. IC 16-41-9-13 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 13. (a) The court shall determine what part of the cost of
care or treatment ordered by the court, if any, the individual with a
communicable disease can pay and whether there are other available
sources of public or private funding responsible for payment of the
individual's care or treatment. The individual with a communicable
disease shall provide the court documents and other information
necessary to determine financial ability. If the individual with a
communicable disease cannot pay the full cost of care and other
sources of public or private funding responsible for payment of the
individual's care or treatment are not available, the county is
responsible for the cost. If the individual with a communicable disease:
(1) provides inaccurate or misleading information; or
(2) later becomes able to pay the full cost of care;
the individual with a communicable disease becomes liable to the
county for costs paid by the county.
(b) Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d), the costs incurred
by the county under this chapter are limited to the costs incurred under
section 1.5 of this chapter.
(c) However, subsection (b) does not relieve the county of the
responsibility for the costs of an individual with a communicable
disease who is ordered by the court under this chapter to a county
facility.
(d) Costs, other than costs described in subsections (b) and (c) that
are incurred by the county for care ordered by the court under this
chapter, shall be reimbursed by the state under IC 16-21-7 to the extent
funds have been appropriated for reimbursement.
SECTION 53. IC 16-41-9-15 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 15. In carrying out its duties under this chapter, a public
health authority shall attempt to seek the cooperation of cases,
individuals with a communicable disease, contacts, or suspect cases to
implement the least restrictive but medically necessary procedures to
protect the public health.
SECTION 54. IC 16-41-15-1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


1, 2026]. Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "approved laboratory" means
a laboratory approved by the state department for making serological
tests.
SECTION 55. IC 16-41-15-6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 6. A person in professional attendance at a birth shall
carefully examine the eyes of the infant and if there is reason for
suspecting infection in one (1) or both eyes, the person in professional
attendance at the birth shall apply such prophylactic treatment as may
be prescribed by the state department.
SECTION 56. IC 16-41-15-10 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 10. A physician who diagnoses a pregnancy of a woman
shall take or cause to be taken a sample of blood:
(1) at the time of diagnosis of pregnancy; and
(2) during the third trimester of pregnancy, if the woman belongs
to a high risk population for which the Centers for Disease
Control “Sexually Transmitted Diseases Treatment Guidelines"
recommend a third trimester syphilis testing;
and shall submit each sample to an approved laboratory for a standard
serological test for syphilis.
SECTION 57. IC 16-41-15-11 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 11. A person other than a physician who is permitted by
law to attend a pregnant woman, but who is not permitted by law to
take blood specimens, shall cause a sample of the blood of the pregnant
woman to be taken by a licensed physician, who shall submit the
sample to an approved laboratory for a standard serological test for
syphilis.
SECTION 58. IC 16-41-15-12 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 12. If at the time of delivery positive evidence is not
available to show that standard serological tests for syphilis have been
made in accordance with section 10 of this chapter, the person in
attendance at the delivery shall take or cause to be taken a sample of
the blood of the woman at the time of the delivery and shall submit the
sample to an approved laboratory for a standard serological test for
syphilis.
SECTION 59. IC 16-41-15-15 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 15. Whenever a person with a sexually transmitted
infection is admitted to a benevolent, charitable, or penal institution or
correctional facility of Indiana, the warden or official in charge of the
institution or correctional facility shall institute and provide the proper
treatment for the person and shall carry out laboratory tests necessary
to determine the nature, course, duration, and results of the treatment.
SECTION 60. IC 16-41-15-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.147-2023,
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


SECTION 24, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. The services of the laboratory of the state
department shall be available without charge for the laboratory
diagnoses and tests as may be necessary to carry out sections section
14 and 15 of this chapter. The state institutions and the state
department shall cooperate in every reasonable way in the prevention
and suppression of sexually transmitted infection.
SECTION 61. IC 16-41-15-17 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 17. Sections 10 through 12 of this chapter do not apply
to the following:
(1) A person who administers to or treats the sick or suffering by
spiritual means or prayer.
(2) A person who, because of the person's religious belief, in good
faith selects and depends upon spiritual means or prayer for
treatment or cure of diseases.
SECTION 62. IC 16-41-39.8-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.156-2011,
SECTION 38, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) The lead trust fund established by
IC 13-17-14-6 (repealed) is reestablished to provide a source of money
for the purposes set forth in subsection (f).
(b) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from the
money in the fund.
(c) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public money may be invested. Interest that accrues
from these investments shall be deposited in the fund.
(d) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not revert
to the state general fund.
(e) The sources of money for the fund are the following:
(1) License fees established under section 6 of this chapter.
(2) Appropriations made by the general assembly, gifts, and
donations intended for deposit in the fund.
(3) Penalties imposed under sections section 14 and 15 of this
chapter for violations of this chapter and rules adopted under this
chapter concerning lead-based paint activities.
(4) Any gifts and grants to the fund.
(f) The state department may use money in the fund to do the
following:
(1) Pay the expenses of administering this chapter.
(2) Cover other costs related to implementation of 40 CFR 745 for
lead-based paint activities in target housing and child occupied
facilities.
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


SECTION 63. IC 16-41-39.8-10, AS ADDED BY P.L.57-2009,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. Without limiting the authority to inspect under
IC 16-41-5-1, The state department may do the following:
(1) Inspect the site of a lead-based paint activities project:
(A) during the project; or
(B) after the project is completed.
(2) Conduct an investigation of a lead-based paint activities
project upon:
(A) the state department's own initiation; or
(B) the receipt of a complaint by a person.
(3) Conduct an investigation of the provider of a lead-based paint
activities training course upon:
(A) the state department's own initiation; or
(B) the receipt of a complaint by a person.
SECTION 64. IC 16-41-39.8-15 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 15. A person who obstructs, delays, resists,
prevents, or interferes with:
(1) the state department; or
(2) the state department's personnel or designated agent;
in the performance of an inspection or investigation performed under
IC 16-41-5-1 commits a Class C infraction. Each day of violation of
this section constitutes a separate infraction.
SECTION 65. IC 16-42-5.3-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.151-2024,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) As used in this chapter, "board" refers
to the Indiana state board of animal health established by
IC 15-17-3-1.
(a) (b) As used in this chapter, "end consumer" means a person who
is the last person to purchase any food product or meat product and
who does not resell the food product.
(c) As used in this chapter, "meat product" has the meaning set
forth in IC 15-17-2-54.
(b) (d) As used in this chapter, "roadside stand" means a structure,
including a tent, stand, vehicle, or trailer that is:
(1) visible from a road; and
(2) located not more than one hundred (100) feet from the edge of
the side of the road;
where whole uncut produce, food products that are not time
temperature control for safety food, poultry that is exempt under
IC 15-17-5-11, rabbits, or eggs permitted for sale by the state egg board
are sold to an end consumer.
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


SECTION 66. IC 16-42-5.3-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.49-2022,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. The production and sale of:
(1) food products by a home based vendor; or
(2) meat products;
in accordance with this chapter are exempt from the requirements of
this title that apply to food establishments.
SECTION 67. IC 16-42-5.3-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.49-2022,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) A home based vendor or an individual
selling meat products shall obtain a food handler certificate from a
certificate issuer that is accredited by the American National Standards
Institute.
(b) Upon request, a home based vendor or an individual selling
meat products shall provide a copy of the food handler certificate
required by subsection (a) to the state department or an end consumer.
(c) A home based vendor or an individual selling meat products
shall provide a copy of the food handler certificate required by
subsection (a) to the local health department in the county where the
individual selling meat products or the home based vendor's
residence is located.
SECTION 68. IC 16-42-5.3-10.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.5. (a) This section applies to
the sale of meat products by an individual at the individual's
primary residence.
(b) For the purpose of conducting sales at the individual's
primary residence, meat products from animals:
(1) raised at the individual's primary residence; and
(2) slaughtered and processed at an official establishment (as
defined in IC 15-17-2-72);
are exempt from the requirements of this title that apply to food
establishments. Meat products at the individual's primary
residence where the product is produced must be kept frozen at the
point of sale and through delivery by the producer to the end
consumer. An individual who sells meat products under this section
shall comply with the label requirements set forth in this chapter.
(c) An individual who sells a meat product under this section
may not further alter or process a meat product that is slaughtered
and processed at an official establishment.
(d) An individual selling a meat product under this section must
comply with all refrigeration and freezer requirements for meat
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


products required by:
(1) the board; or
(2) the state department.
(e) Before an individual sells meat products under this section,
the individual shall do the following:
(1) Obtain a food handler certificate from a certificate issuer
that is accredited by the American National Standards
Institute.
(2) Complete and pass the certified food protection manager
course from a list of providers approved by the state
department.
(f) Upon request, an individual selling meat products shall
provide a copy of the food handler certificate required by
subsection (e) to the state department or an end consumer.
(g) An individual selling meat products shall provide a copy of
the food handler certificate required by subsection (e) to the local
health department in the county where the individual selling meat
products from cattle or swine or the home based vendor's
residence is located.
(h) The state department shall make the list of approved
certified food protection manager courses available on its website
by July 1, 2027.
SECTION 69. IC 16-42-5.3-12, AS ADDED BY P.L.49-2022,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. Notwithstanding any other law, a local unit of
government (as defined in IC 14-22-31.5-1) may not by ordinance or
resolution require any licensure, certification, or inspection of foods or
food products of a home based vendor or an individual vendor who
prepares and sells food products or meat products under this chapter.
SECTION 70. IC 16-49-4-11, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) The statewide child fatality review
committee shall submit to the legislative council, governor, department
of child services, state department, and commission on improving the
status of children in Indiana on or before December 31 of each year a
report that includes the following information:
(1) A summary of the data collected and reviewed by the
statewide child fatality review committee in the previous calendar
year.
(2) Trends and patterns that have been identified by the statewide
child fatality review committee concerning deaths of children in
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


Indiana.
(3) Recommended actions or resources to prevent future child
fatalities in Indiana.
A report submitted under this section to the legislative council must be
in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
(b) The statewide child fatality review committee shall provide a
copy of a report submitted under this section to a member of the public
upon request.
(c) The state department shall make the report available on the state
department's Internet web site. website.
(d) A summary of data collected under subsection (a)(1) must
include the most recent date on which a child whose death is being
reviewed had received an immunization.
SECTION 71. IC 16-50-1-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.65-2021,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) If a health care provider or a health care
facility has a patient who suffers a death occurring during pregnancy,
irrespective of the duration and site of the pregnancy, through one (1)
year after the pregnancy and the health care provider or health care
facility has knowledge of the circumstances of the maternal death, the
health care provider or the health care facility shall report the maternal
death for review to the statewide maternal mortality review committee
in the manner established by the statewide maternal mortality review
coordinator under IC 16-50-2-4.
(b) The state department may provide data held by the state
department, including:
(1) vital statistics;
(2) trauma data; and
(3) hospital discharge data; and
(4) immunization data;
to the statewide maternal mortality review coordinator to aid in the
identification of cases of maternal morbidity and maternal mortality.
SECTION 72. IC 16-50-1-9, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) The statewide maternal mortality review
committee shall, before July 1 of each year, submit a report to the state
department that includes the following information:
(1) A summary of the data collected regarding the reviews
conducted by the statewide maternal mortality review committee.
(2) Actions recommended by the statewide maternal mortality
review committee to improve systems of care and enhance
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


coordination to reduce maternal morbidity and maternal mortality
in Indiana.
(3) Legislative recommendations for consideration by the general
assembly.
(b) A report released under this section must not contain identifying
information relating to the deaths reviewed by the statewide maternal
mortality review committee.
(c) The state department shall make a report prepared under this
section available to public inspection and post the report on the state
department's Internet web site. website.
(d) A summary of data collected under subsection (a)(1) must
include the most recent date on which an individual whose death
is being reviewed had received an immunization.
SECTION 73. IC 20-19-3-41 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 41. The department shall publish
on the department's website the information received from each
school under IC 20-34-3-28.
SECTION 74. IC 20-26-22.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 22.5. School Health Services
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "health care provider" has the
meaning set forth in IC 16-18-2-163(a).
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "health records" has the
meaning set forth in IC 16-18-2-168(a).
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "informed consent" has the
meaning set forth in IC 16-36-7-16.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "school based health center"
means a health clinic that:
(1) is located in or near a school or school facility of a school
corporation;
(2) is organized or promoted through school, community, or
health care provider relationships;
(3) provides primary health services to children by health
care providers, in accordance with state and federal law; and
(4) meets any other requirements necessary for the operation
of a school based health center.
Sec. 5. (a) As used in this chapter, "school nursing services"
refers to the responsibilities of a school nurse as described in
IC 20-34-3-6.
(b) The term does not include services provided:
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(1) in a school based health center; or
(2) by an individual who is not employed by the school.
Sec. 6. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), a school
corporation may employ at least one (1) registered nurse who holds
a bachelor of science in nursing to coordinate school nursing
services in the school corporation.
(b) A school corporation may employ a registered nurse who
does not hold a bachelor of science in nursing to coordinate school
nursing services in the school corporation if the registered nurse:
(1) was employed by the school corporation on June 30, 2000,
to coordinate health services; and
(2) has been continuously employed by the school corporation
to coordinate health services described in subdivision (1) since
June 30, 2000.
Sec. 7. If a school corporation provides school nursing services,
the services must be provided to students in accordance with:
(1) all state and federal laws and regulations; and
(2) the applicable standard of care.
Sec. 8. A school corporation may contract with a health care
provider, health system, or community partner to establish a
school based health center for the purpose of providing services to
students beyond the scope of school nursing services if the
following requirements are met:
(1) The school based health center must be a distinct legal
entity that is separate from the school corporation.
(2) The establishment of a school based health center may not
replace the role of school nurses who are employed by the
school corporation to provide first aid and emergency
services.
(3) Student participation in services provided by a school
based health center must be voluntary.
(4) The school based health center or school corporation may
not offer an incentive to a student or parent of a student in
exchange for participation in services provided by the school
based health center.
(5) A student, if the student is an emancipated minor, or the
student's parent or guardian, if the student is an
unemancipated minor, must provide written informed consent
for the student to receive services at a school based health
center, and the parent of a student, if the student is an
unemancipated minor, must be present at the time the student
receives services at a school based health center.
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(6) Services provided at a school based health center must be
provided by a health care provider.
(7) A health care provider employed by or working in a school
based health center must maintain health records in
accordance with the federal Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act (HIPAA).
(8) Except as required by law, a school or school corporation
may not access a student's health records.
(9) A school, school corporation, or health care provider may
not be obligated to violate this section, including participating
in a grant program that requires a school, school corporation,
or health care provider to violate this section.
Sec. 9. The state board shall amend any rules necessary to
comply with this chapter.
SECTION 75. IC 20-33-8-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.1-2005,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) As used in this chapter, "expulsion" means
a disciplinary or other action whereby a student:
(1) is separated from school attendance for a period exceeding ten
(10) school days;
(2) is separated from school attendance for the balance of the
current semester or current year unless a student is permitted to
complete required examinations in order to receive credit for
courses taken in the current semester or current year; or
(3) is separated from school attendance for the period prescribed
under section 16 of this chapter, which may include an
assignment to attend an alternative school, an alternative
educational program, or a homebound educational program.
(b) The term does not include situations when a student is
(1) disciplined under section 25 of this chapter.
(2) removed from school in accordance with IC 20-34-3-9; or
(3) removed from school for failure to comply with the
immunization requirements of IC 20-34-4-5.
SECTION 76. IC 20-33-8-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.1-2005,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) As used in this chapter, "suspension" means
any disciplinary action that does not constitute an expulsion under
section 3 of this chapter, whereby a student is separated from school
attendance for a period of not more than ten (10) school days.
(b) The term does not include a situation in which a student is
(1) disciplined under section 25 of this chapter.
(2) removed from school in accordance with IC 20-34-3-9; or
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(3) removed from school for failure to comply with the
immunization requirements of IC 20-34-4-5.
SECTION 77. IC 20-34-3-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.1-2005,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Except as otherwise provided, A student
may not be required to undergo, in a manner that violates
IC 22-5-9-5, any testing, examination, immunization, or treatment.
required under this chapter or IC 20-34-4 when the child's parent
objects on religious grounds. A religious objection does not exempt a
child from any testing, examination, immunization, or treatment
required under this chapter or IC 20-34-4 unless the objection is:
(1) made in writing;
(2) signed by the child's parent; and
(3) delivered to the child's teacher or to the individual who might
order a test, an exam, an immunization, or a treatment absent the
objection.
(b) A teacher may not be compelled to undergo, in a manner that
violates IC 22-5-9-5, any testing, examination, or treatment. under this
chapter or IC 20-34-4 if the teacher objects on religious grounds. A
religious objection does not exempt an objecting individual from any
testing, examination, or treatment required under this chapter or
IC 20-34-4 unless the objection is:
(1) made in writing;
(2) signed by the objecting individual; and
(3) delivered to the principal of the school in which the objecting
individual teaches.
SECTION 78. IC 20-34-3-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 3. If a physician certifies that a particular immunization
required by this chapter or IC 20-34-4 is or may be detrimental to a
student's health, the requirements of this chapter or IC 20-34-4 for that
particular immunization is inapplicable for the student until the
immunization is found no longer detrimental to the student's health.
SECTION 79. IC 20-34-3-4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 4. The governing body of a school corporation may provide
for the inspection of students by a school physician to determine
whether any child suffers from disease, disability, decayed teeth, or
other defects that may reduce the student's efficiency or prevent the
student from receiving the full benefit of the student's school work.
SECTION 80. IC 20-34-3-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 5. If the parent of a student furnishes a certificate of
examination from an Indiana physician at the beginning of a school
year, the student is exempt from any examination the governing body
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


requires under section 4 of this chapter. The certificate of examination
must state that the physician has examined the student and reported the
results of the examination to the parent. The governing body may
require a parent to periodically furnish additional certificates.
SECTION 81. IC 20-34-3-6, AS ADDED BY P.L.1-2005,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The governing body of a school corporation
may appoint one (1) or more school physicians and one (1) or more
nurses who are registered to practice nursing in Indiana.
(b) A nurse appointed under this section is responsible for
emergency nursing care of students when an illness or accident occurs
during school hours or on or near school property.
(c) Notwithstanding any physical or mental assessment or
treatment required or permitted under state or federal law, a
school may not conduct a physical or mental assessment or
treatment of a student unless the physical or mental assessment or
treatment is related to an illness or accident that occurred during
school hours or on or near school property.
SECTION 82. IC 20-34-3-9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 9. (a) If a student is ill, has a communicable disease, or is
infested with parasites, the school principal may send the student home
with a note to the student's parent. The note must describe the nature
of the illness or infestation and, if appropriate, recommend that the
family physician be consulted.
(b) If the parent of a student who is sent home under this section is
financially unable to provide the necessary medical care, the medical
care shall be provided by a public health facility. If a public health
facility is not available, the township trustee or an appropriate
governmental agency shall provide the necessary care.
(c) A student who is sent home under this section may be readmitted
to the school:
(1) when it is apparent to school officials that the student is no
longer ill, no longer has a communicable disease, or is no longer
infested with parasites;
(2) upon certification of a physician that the student is no longer
ill, no longer has a communicable disease, or is no longer infested
with parasites;
(3) upon certification of a physician that the student has a
communicable disease, but the disease is not transmissible
through normal school contacts; or
(4) upon certification of a Christian Science practitioner, who is
listed in The Christian Science Journal, that based on the
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


practitioner's observation the student apparently is no longer ill,
no longer has a communicable disease, or is no longer infested
with parasites.
If school personnel disagree with the certifying physician or Christian
Science practitioner as to whether the student should be readmitted to
school, the local health officer shall determine whether the student may
be readmitted to school.
(d) An individual who objects to the determination made by the
local health officer under this section may appeal to the commissioner
of the Indiana department of health, who is the ultimate authority.
IC 4-21.5 applies to appeals under this subsection.
SECTION 83. IC 20-34-3-10 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 10. (a) A sickle cell anemia test shall be administered to
each student when the examining physician or school nurse determines
that the test is necessary. The physician shall state on the examination
form whether the test was given and, if it was, the result. All positive
results shall be filed with the examining physician and the Indiana
department of health.
(b) The Indiana department of health and the state board shall adopt
joint rules concerning sickle cell anemia testing equipment,
qualifications for sickle cell anemia testing personnel, and sickle cell
anemia testing procedures.
(c) Records of all tests administered under this section shall be
made and continuously maintained by the Indiana department of health
to provide information useful in protecting, promoting, and maintaining
the health of students.
SECTION 84. IC 20-34-3-11 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 11. (a) The governing body of a school corporation may
require students to be tested for lead poisoning.
(b) If a student's parent states in writing that the parent is financially
unable to pay for a test under this section, the student shall be referred
to the free clinic or public health facility in the area that provides
services for indigents.
(c) The Indiana department of health and the state board shall adopt
joint rules concerning lead poisoning testing under this section.
(d) Records of all tests administered under this section shall be
made and continuously maintained by the Indiana department of health
to provide information useful in protecting, promoting, and maintaining
the health of students.
SECTION 85. IC 20-34-3-12 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 12. (a) For purposes of this section, "modified clinical
technique" means a battery of vision tests that includes:
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(1) a visual acuity test to determine an individual's ability to see
at various distances;
(2) a refractive error test to determine the focusing power of the
eye;
(3) an ocular health test to determine any external or internal
abnormalities of the eye; and
(4) a binocular coordination test to determine if the eyes are
working together properly.
(b) For purposes of this section, "vision screening" means the testing
of visual acuity to determine an individual's ability to see at various
distances using:
(1) the Snellen chart;
(2) Sloan letter charts;
(3) HOTV letter or LEA symbol charts for younger students; or
(4) technology devices, including photoscreens or autorefractors,
for a child who is unable to perform the tests described in
subdivisions (1) through (3);
at a distance of either ten (10) or twenty (20) feet for distance vision,
depending on the calibration of the chart being used, and a distance of
fourteen (14) inches for near vision.
(c) The modified clinical technique shall be performed by an
ophthalmologist licensed as a physician under IC 25-22.5 or an
optometrist licensed under IC 25-24.
(d) The governing body of each school corporation shall conduct a
vision test for each student enrolling in or transferring into:
(1) either kindergarten or grade 1;
(2) grade 3;
(3) grade 5; and
(4) grade 8;
and for each student suspected of having a visual defect.
(e) The vision test for students in kindergarten and grade 1 shall be
conducted using the modified clinical technique unless a waiver is
granted under section 13 of this chapter. If a waiver is granted for a
school corporation, the governing body shall conduct a vision screening
described in subsection (b) upon each student's enrollment in
kindergarten or grade 1.
(f) Each student described in subsection (d)(2), (d)(3), and (d)(4),
and each student suspected of having a visual defect shall be tested
using a vision screening of the student's visual acuity.
(g) The following standards apply for a vision screening under
subsections (e) and (f):
(1) A student in kindergarten or grade 1 who is unable to read
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


with each eye the 20/30 line of the Snellen chart or the 20/32 line
of the Sloan letters, HOTV, or LEA symbol optotypes shall be
recommended for further examination based upon the
recommendation of the individual performing the screening.
(2) A student:
(A) in grade 3, grade 5, or grade 8; or
(B) suspected of having a visual defect;
who is unable to read with each eye the 20/30 line of the Snellen
chart or the 20/32 line of the Sloan letters shall be recommended
for further examination based upon the recommendation of the
individual performing the screening.
(3) If a student at any grade level is recommended for further
examination, the school must provide a written recommendation
for further examination to the parent or legal guardian of the
student.
(h) Records of all tests shall be made and continuously maintained
by the school corporation to provide information useful in protecting,
promoting, and maintaining the health of students. The Indiana
department of health, in consultation with the state board, shall adopt
rules concerning vision testing equipment, qualifications of vision
testing personnel, visual screening procedures, and criteria for failure
and referral in the screening tests based on accepted medical practice
and standards.
(i) The school corporation's governing body and the superintendent
shall receive annually the following information concerning the tests
conducted under this section:
(1) The number of students eligible for testing, by grade.
(2) The number of students tested, by grade.
(3) The number of students by grade who were tested using the
modified clinical technique.
(4) The number of students by grade who were tested using a
vision screening.
(5) The number of students by grade who passed a test.
(6) The number of students by grade who failed a test or were
referred for further testing.
(7) The name of the individual or department that supervised the
testing.
(j) Each school corporation shall annually provide to the
department, for each school within the school corporation, the
following information concerning the tests conducted under this
section:
(1) the number of students tested by grade;
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(2) the number of students by grade who were tested using the
modified clinical technique;
(3) the number of students by grade who were tested using a
vision screening;
(4) the number of students who passed a test by grade; and
(5) the number of students who failed a test or who were referred
for further testing.
(k) Not later than October 1 each year, the department shall report
for the previous school year:
(1) a compilation of the information received from school
corporations under subsection (j);
(2) information received under section 13 of this chapter,
including:
(A) the number of school corporations that applied for a
waiver;
(B) the number of waivers approved;
(C) the number of waivers denied;
(D) the name of each school corporation that applied for a
waiver and whether the waiver was approved or denied; and
(E) the reason for the approval or denial;
(3) the total number of students eligible for testing; and
(4) the total number of students tested;
to the legislative council in electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
SECTION 86. IC 20-34-3-13 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 13. (a) If a school corporation is unable to comply with
section 12(e) of this chapter, the governing body may, before
November 1 of a school year, request from the secretary of education
a waiver of the requirements of section 12(e) of this chapter.
(b) The waiver request under subsection (a) must:
(1) be in writing;
(2) include the reason or reasons that necessitated the waiver
request; and
(3) indicate the extent to which the governing body attempted to
comply with the requirements under section 12(e) of this chapter.
(c) The secretary of education shall take action on the waiver
request not later than thirty (30) days after receiving the waiver request.
(d) The secretary of education may:
(1) approve the waiver request;
(2) deny the waiver request; or
(3) provide whatever relief that may be available to enable the
school corporation to comply with the requirements under section
12(e) of this chapter.
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(e) If the secretary of education approves the waiver request, the
governing body shall conduct an annual screening test of the visual
acuity of each student as described in section 12(b) of this chapter upon
the student's enrollment in or transfer to grade 1.
(f) The governing body of each school corporation shall make and
maintain records of all waivers requested by the governing body under
this section.
(g) The secretary of education shall make and continuously maintain
records of all actions taken by the secretary of education concerning all
waivers requested under this section.
(h) A request for a waiver under this section must be made annually.
SECTION 87. IC 20-34-3-14 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 14. (a) The governing body of each school corporation
shall annually conduct an audiometer test or a similar test to determine
the hearing efficiency of the following students:
(1) Students in grade 1, grade 4, grade 7, and grade 10.
(2) A student who has transferred into the school corporation.
(3) A student who is suspected of having hearing defects.
(b) A governing body may appoint the technicians and assistants
necessary to perform the testing required under this section.
(c) Records of all tests shall be made and continuously maintained
by the school corporation to provide information that may assist in
diagnosing and treating any student's auditory abnormality. However,
diagnosis and treatment shall be performed only on recommendation
of an Indiana physician who has examined the student.
(d) The governing body may adopt rules for the administration of
this section.
SECTION 88. IC 20-34-3-28 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 28. (a) As used in this section,
"school" means the following:
(1) A public school, including a charter school.
(2) A state accredited school.
(3) A nonaccredited nonpublic school that has at least one (1)
employee.
(4) A laboratory school established under IC 20-24.5-2.
(5) The Indiana School for the Blind and Visually Impaired
established by IC 20-21-2-1.
(6) The Indiana School for the Deaf established by
IC 20-22-2-1.
(b) A school, a before school program, and an after school
program shall report to the department the ingredients in each
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


food product the school or program provides to a student enrolled
in the school or program.
SECTION 89. IC 20-34-4-2 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 2. (a) Every child residing in Indiana who is enrolled in an
accredited elementary school or high school shall be immunized as
determined by the Indiana department of health against:
(1) diphtheria;
(2) pertussis (whooping cough);
(3) tetanus;
(4) measles;
(5) rubella;
(6) poliomyelitis;
(7) mumps;
(8) varicella;
(9) hepatitis A;
(10) hepatitis B; and
(11) meningitis.
(b) The Indiana department of health may expand or otherwise
modify the list of communicable diseases that require documentation
of immunity as medical information becomes available that would
warrant the expansion or modification in the interest of public health.
(c) Before November 30 of each year, the Indiana department of
health shall publish a two (2) year calendar of immunization
requirements and recommendations. The calendar must include:
(1) the immunization requirements for the following school year;
and
(2) recommendations for immunization requirements for the year
subsequent to the following school year.
(d) The publishing time frame for the calendar described in
subsection (c) does not apply in the event of an emergency as
determined by the state health commissioner.
(e) The Indiana department of health shall adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 specifying the:
(1) required immunizations;
(2) child's age for administering each vaccine;
(3) adequately immunizing doses; and
(4) method of documentation of proof of immunity.
SECTION 90. IC 20-34-4-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.160-2023,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Each school shall notify each parent of a
student who enrolls in the school of the requirement that the student
must be immunized and that the immunization is required for the
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


student's continued enrollment, attendance, or residence at the school
unless:
(1) the parent or student provides the appropriate documentation
of immunity; or
(2) IC 20-34-3-2 or IC 20-34-3-3 applies.
(b) (a) A school that enrolls grade 6 students shall provide each
parent of a student who is entering grade 6 with information prescribed
by the Indiana department of health under subsection (c) (b)
concerning the link between cancer and the human papillomavirus
(HPV) infection and that an immunization against the human
papillomavirus (HPV) infection is available.
(c) (b) The Indiana department of health shall provide a school
described in subsection (b) (a) with the information concerning cancer
and the human papillomavirus (HPV) infection required in subsection
(b). (a). The information must include the following:
(1) The latest scientific information on the immunization against
the human papillomavirus (HPV) infection and the
immunization's effectiveness against causes of cancer.
(2) That a pap smear is still critical for the detection of
precancerous changes in the cervix to allow for treatment before
cervical cancer develops.
(3) Information concerning the means in which the human
papillomavirus (HPV) infection is contracted.
(4) A statement that any questions or concerns concerning
immunizing the child against human papillomavirus (HPV) could
be answered by contacting a health care provider.
(d) (c) The Indiana department of health shall provide the
department of education with material concerning immunizations and
immunization preventable diseases for distribution to parents and
guardians. The department of education shall provide these materials
to schools to be provided to students' parents and guardians. These
materials may be distributed by a school by posting the required
information on the school's website.
(e) Any notification or materials provided or distributed by the
Indiana department of health or a school to a parent of a student
regarding required or recommended immunizations for the student
must clearly delineate or label immunizations that are required and
immunizations that are only recommended.
SECTION 91. IC 20-34-4-4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 4. (a) The parent of any student who has not received the
immunizations required under this chapter shall present the student to
a health care provider authorized to administer the immunizations.
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(b) The health care provider who administers the required
immunizations to a student or the health care provider's designee shall
enter the immunization information into the state immunization data
registry in accordance with IC 16-38-5.
SECTION 92. IC 20-34-4-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 5. (a) Each school shall require the parent of a student who
has enrolled in the school to furnish, not later than the first day of
school attendance, proof of the student's immunization status, either as
a written document from the health care provider who administered the
immunization or documentation provided from the state immunization
data registry.
(b) The statement must show, except for a student to whom
IC 20-34-3-2 or IC 20-34-3-3 applies, that the student has been
immunized as required under section 2 of this chapter. The statement
must include the student's date of birth and the date of each
immunization.
(c) A student may not be permitted to attend school beyond the first
day of school without furnishing the documentation described in
subsections (a) and (b) unless:
(1) the school gives the parent of the student a waiver; or
(2) the local health department or a health care provider
determines that the student's immunization schedule has been
delayed due to extreme circumstances and that the required
immunizations will not be completed before the first day of
school.
The waiver referred to in subdivision (1) may not be granted for a
period that exceeds twenty (20) school days. If subdivision (2) applies,
the parent of the student shall furnish the written statement and a
schedule, approved by a health care provider who is authorized to
administer the immunizations or the local health department, for the
completion of the remainder of the immunizations.
(d) The Indiana department of health may commence an action
against a school under IC 4-21.5-3-6 or IC 4-21.5-4 for the issuance of
an order of compliance for failure to enforce this section.
(e) Neither a religious objection under IC 20-34-3-2 nor an
exception for the student's health under IC 20-34-3-3 relieves a parent
from the reporting requirements under this section.
(f) The Indiana department of health shall adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 to implement this section.
SECTION 93. IC 20-34-4.5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.117-2017,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Subject to IC 22-5-9, a school nurse may
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


administer emergency stock medication obtained under section 1 of
this chapter to any of the following individuals if the individual is
demonstrating signs or symptoms of a life-threatening emergency and
the individual does not have emergency medication at the school or the
individual's prescription is not available:
(1) Students at the school.
(2) School employees.
(3) Visitors at the school.
(b) Subject to IC 22-5-9, school employees may administer
emergency stock medication obtained under section 1 of this chapter
if the following are met:
(1) The school employee has voluntarily received training in:
(A) recognizing a life-threatening emergency; and
(B) the proper administration of emergency medication;
by a health care provider who is licensed or certified in Indiana,
for whom the administration of emergency medication is within
the health care provider's scope of practice, who has received
training in the administration of emergency medication, and who
is knowledgeable in recognizing the symptoms of a
life-threatening emergency and the administration of emergency
medication.
(2) The individual to whom the emergency stock medication is
being administered is:
(A) a student at the school;
(B) a school employee; or
(C) a visitor at the school.
SECTION 94. IC 20-34-10 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 10. Health Profession Education Program
Sec. 1. This chapter does not apply to a contract entered into or
renewed before July 1, 2026.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "health profession education
program" means an education program that:
(1) is designed to prepare a student for a career in a health
profession regulated by an entity described in IC 25-0.5-11;
and
(2) requires a student to complete clinical training or clinical
experience at an offsite facility.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "immunization" means the
treatment of an individual with a vaccine to produce immunity.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "student" means a student
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


enrolled in a health profession education program.
Sec. 5. A student may not be required to receive an
immunization as a condition of:
(1) participating in; or
(2) obtaining;
clinical training or clinical experience required by a health
profession education program if receiving the immunization is
against the student's conscience.
Sec. 6. (a) A student may bring a civil action against an entity
that violates this chapter.
(b) The court may award to a student who prevails in an action
under this section any of the following:
(1) Injunctive relief.
(2) Costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
SECTION 95. IC 21-7-13-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2007,
SECTION 243, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. "Academic term"
(1) for purposes of this title (other than IC 21-40), has the
meaning set forth in IC 21-12-1-2. and
(2) for purposes of IC 21-40, has the meaning set forth in
IC 21-40-1-2.
SECTION 96. IC 21-40-1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (General Provisions; Definitions).
SECTION 97. IC 21-40-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Immunization Requirements at State Educational Institutions).
SECTION 98. IC 21-44-8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 8. Health Profession Education Program
Sec. 1. This chapter does not apply to a contract entered into or
renewed before July 1, 2026.
Sec. 2. (a) As used in this chapter, "health profession education
program" means an education program that:
(1) is designed to prepare a student for a career in a health
profession regulated by an entity described in IC 25-0.5-11;
and
(2) requires a student to complete clinical training or clinical
experience at an offsite facility.
(b) The term includes an intern, residency, and graduate
program (as defined in IC 21-44-1-12).
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "immunization" means the
treatment of an individual with a vaccine to produce immunity.
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "student" means a student
enrolled in a health profession education program.
Sec. 5. A student may not be required to receive an
immunization as a condition of:
(1) participating in; or
(2) obtaining;
clinical training or clinical experience required by a health
profession education program if receiving the immunization is
against the student's conscience.
Sec. 6. (a) A student may bring a civil action against an entity
that violates this chapter.
(b) The court may award to a student who prevails in an action
under this section any of the following:
(1) Injunctive relief.
(2) Costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
SECTION 99. IC 22-4-15-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 121, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Regarding an individual's
most recent separation from employment before filing an initial or
additional claim for benefits, an individual who voluntarily left the
employment without good cause in connection with the work or was
discharged from the employment for just cause is ineligible for waiting
period or benefit rights for the week in which the disqualifying
separation occurred and until:
(1) the individual has earned remuneration in employment in at
least eight (8) weeks; and
(2) the remuneration earned equals or exceeds the product of the
weekly benefit amount multiplied by eight (8).
If the qualification amount has not been earned at the expiration of an
individual's benefit period, the unearned amount shall be carried
forward to an extended benefit period or to the benefit period of a
subsequent claim.
(b) When it has been determined that an individual has been
separated from employment under disqualifying conditions as outlined
in this section, the maximum benefit amount of the individual's current
claim, as initially determined, shall be reduced by an amount
determined as follows:
(1) For the first separation from employment under disqualifying
conditions, the maximum benefit amount of the individual's
current claim is equal to the result of:
(A) the maximum benefit amount of the individual's current
claim, as initially determined; multiplied by
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(B) seventy-five percent (75%);
rounded (if not already a multiple of one dollar ($1)) to the next
higher dollar.
(2) For the second separation from employment under
disqualifying conditions, the maximum benefit amount of the
individual's current claim is equal to the result of:
(A) the maximum benefit amount of the individual's current
claim determined under subdivision (1); multiplied by
(B) eighty-five percent (85%);
rounded (if not already a multiple of one dollar ($1)) to the next
higher dollar.
(3) For the third and any subsequent separation from employment
under disqualifying conditions, the maximum benefit amount of
the individual's current claim is equal to the result of:
(A) the maximum benefit amount of the individual's current
claim determined under subdivision (2); multiplied by
(B) ninety percent (90%);
rounded (if not already a multiple of one dollar ($1)) to the next
higher dollar.
(c) The disqualifications provided in this section shall be subject to
the following modifications:
(1) An individual shall not be subject to disqualification because
of separation from the individual's employment if:
(A) the individual left to accept with another employer
previously secured permanent full-time work which offered
reasonable expectation of continued covered employment and
betterment of wages or working conditions and thereafter was
employed on said job;
(B) having been simultaneously employed by two (2)
employers, the individual leaves one (1) such employer
voluntarily without good cause in connection with the work
but remains in employment with the second employer with a
reasonable expectation of continued employment; or
(C) the individual left to accept recall made by a base period
employer.
(2) An individual whose unemployment is the result of medically
substantiated physical disability and who is involuntarily
unemployed after having made reasonable efforts to maintain the
employment relationship shall not be subject to disqualification
under this section for such separation.
(3) An individual who left work to enter the armed forces of the
United States shall not be subject to disqualification under this
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


section for such leaving of work.
(4) An individual whose employment is terminated under the
compulsory retirement provision of a collective bargaining
agreement to which the employer is a party, or under any other
plan, system, or program, public or private, providing for
compulsory retirement and who is otherwise eligible shall not be
deemed to have left the individual's work voluntarily without
good cause in connection with the work. However, if such
individual subsequently becomes reemployed and thereafter
voluntarily leaves work without good cause in connection with the
work, the individual shall be deemed ineligible as outlined in this
section.
(5) An otherwise eligible individual shall not be denied benefits
for any week because the individual is in training approved under
Section 236(a)(1) of the Trade Act of 1974, nor shall the
individual be denied benefits by reason of leaving work to enter
such training, provided the work left is not suitable employment,
or because of the application to any week in training of provisions
in this law (or any applicable federal unemployment
compensation law), relating to availability for work, active search
for work, or refusal to accept work. For purposes of this
subdivision, the term "suitable employment" means with respect
to an individual, work of a substantially equal or higher skill level
than the individual's past adversely affected employment (as
defined for purposes of the Trade Act of 1974), and wages for
such work at not less than eighty percent (80%) of the individual's
average weekly wage as determined for the purposes of the Trade
Act of 1974.
(6) An individual is not subject to disqualification because of
separation from the individual's employment if:
(A) the employment was outside the individual's labor market;
(B) the individual left to accept previously secured full-time
work with an employer in the individual's labor market; and
(C) the individual actually became employed with the
employer in the individual's labor market.
(7) An individual who, but for the voluntary separation to move
to another labor market to join a spouse who had moved to that
labor market, shall not be disqualified for that voluntary
separation, if the individual is otherwise eligible for benefits.
Benefits paid to the spouse whose eligibility is established under
this subdivision shall not be charged against the employer from
whom the spouse voluntarily separated.
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(8) An individual shall not be subject to disqualification if the
individual voluntarily left employment or was discharged due to
circumstances directly caused by domestic or family violence (as
defined in IC 31-9-2-42). An individual who may be entitled to
benefits based on this modification may apply to the office of the
attorney general under IC 5-26.5 to have an address designated by
the office of the attorney general to serve as the individual's
address for purposes of this article.
(9) An individual shall not be subject to disqualification if the
individual
(A) has requested an exemption from an employer's
COVID-19 immunization requirement;
(B) has complied with the requirements set forth in
IC 22-5-4.6; and
(C) was discharged from employment for failing or refusing to
receive an immunization against COVID-19. refuses to
accept, undergo, or engage in a medical intervention (as
defined in IC 22-5-9-2) in or on the individual's body.
As used in this subsection, "labor market" means the area surrounding
an individual's permanent residence, outside which the individual
cannot reasonably commute on a daily basis. In determining whether
an individual can reasonably commute under this subdivision, the
department shall consider the nature of the individual's job.
(d) "Discharge for just cause" as used in this section is defined to
include but not be limited to:
(1) separation initiated by an employer for falsification of an
employment application to obtain employment through
subterfuge;
(2) knowing violation of a reasonable and uniformly enforced rule
of an employer, including a rule regarding attendance;
(3) if an employer does not have a rule regarding attendance, an
individual's unsatisfactory attendance, if good cause for absences
or tardiness is not established;
(4) damaging the employer's property through willful and wanton
misconduct;
(5) refusing to obey instructions;
(6) conduct endangering safety of self or coworkers;
(7) incarceration in jail following conviction of a misdemeanor or
felony by a court of competent jurisdiction; or
(8) any breach of duty in connection with work which is
reasonably owed an employer by an employee.
(e) To verify that domestic or family violence has occurred, an
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


individual who applies for benefits under subsection (c)(8) shall
provide one (1) of the following:
(1) A report of a law enforcement agency (as defined in
IC 10-13-3-10).
(2) A protection order issued under IC 34-26-5.
(3) A foreign protection order (as defined in IC 34-6-2.1-76).
(4) An affidavit from a domestic violence service provider
verifying services provided to the individual by the domestic
violence service provider.
SECTION 100. IC 22-5-4.6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Exemptions from COVID-19 Immunization Requirements).
SECTION 101. IC 22-5-9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 9. Medical Intervention
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "bodily injury" has the meaning
set forth in IC 35-31.5-2-29.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "medical intervention" means:
(1) a medical:
(A) procedure;
(B) test; or
(C) treatment;
(2) an immunization; or
(3) a prophylaxis not described in subdivision (1) or (2).
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "person" has the meaning set
forth in IC 35-31.5-2-234(a).
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "punitive measure" means an
action that results in a negative consequence.
Sec. 5. Notwithstanding any other law, a person may not require
an individual to accept, undergo, or engage in a medical
intervention in or on the individual's body as a condition of:
(1) employment;
(2) entrance;
(3) admission;
(4) compensation;
(5) benefits; or
(6) participation.
Sec. 6. Notwithstanding any other law, a person may not take a
punitive measure against an individual because the individual
refused to accept, undergo, or engage in a medical intervention in
or on the individual's body.
Sec. 7. (a) An individual who suffers bodily injury as a result of
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


a person's violation of section 5 or 6 of this chapter may file an
action in the circuit or superior court of the county in which the
violation occurred.
(b) An individual who files and prevails in an action described
in subsection (a) is entitled to recover from the defendant:
(1) compensatory damages, including damages for lost wages;
and
(2) damages for pain and suffering.
Sec. 8. An individual may report a violation under section 5 or
6 of this chapter to the attorney general.
Sec. 9. Nothing in this chapter precludes:
(1) a power of attorney or proxy from completing the
obligations of the power of attorney or proxy in good faith;
(2) an entity from offering:
(A) a medical:
(i) procedure;
(ii) test; or
(iii) treatment;
(B) an immunization; or
(C) a prophylaxis not described in clause (A) or (B);
at no cost to an individual; or
(3) a person from providing medical intervention to an
individual during an emergency.
SECTION 102. IC 22-12-1-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.142-2013,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) "Class 1 structure" means any part of the
following:
(1) A building or structure that is intended to be or is occupied or
otherwise used in any part by any of the following:
(A) The public.
(B) Three (3) or more tenants.
(C) One (1) or more persons who act as the employees of
another.
(2) A site improvement affecting access by persons with physical
disabilities to a building or structure described in subdivision (1).
(3) Outdoor event equipment.
(4) Any class of buildings or structures that the commission
determines by rules to affect a building or structure described in
subdivision (1), except buildings or structures described in
subsections (c) through (f).
(b) Subsection (a)(1) includes a structure that contains three (3) or
more condominium units (as defined in IC 32-25-2-9) or other units
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


that:
(1) are intended to be or are used or leased by the owner of the
unit; and
(2) are not completely separated from each other by an
unimproved space.
(c) Subsection (a)(1) does not include a building or structure that
(1) is intended to be or is used only for an agricultural purpose on
the land where it is located. and A building or structure under
this subsection includes a stand or another retail building
used only for the sale of food products or meat products (as
defined in IC 16-42-5.3-1) derived from the land where the
stand or retail building is located.
(2) is not used for retail trade or is a stand used for retail sales of
farm produce for eight (8) or less consecutive months in a
calendar year.
(d) Subsection (a)(1) does not include a Class 2 structure.
(e) Subsection (a)(1) does not include a vehicular bridge.
(f) Subsection (a)(1) does not include a structure that is intended to
be or is occupied solely to provide periodic maintenance or repair of:
(1) the structure; or
(2) mechanical or electrical equipment located within and affixed
to the structure.
SECTION 103. IC 25-22.5-8.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 8.7. Exemption From Immunizations
Sec. 1. This chapter does not apply to a contract entered into or
renewed before July 1, 2026.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "immunization" means the
treatment of an individual with a vaccine to produce immunity.
Sec. 3. A physician may not be required to receive an
immunization if receiving the immunization is against the
physician's conscience.
Sec. 4. (a) A physician may bring a civil action against an entity
that violates this chapter.
(b) The court may award to a physician who prevails in an
action under this section any of the following:
(1) Injunctive relief.
(2) Costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
SECTION 104. IC 27-2-30 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


Chapter 30. Health Care Freedom of Conscience
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to a policy or a contract issued,
entered into, delivered, amended, or renewed by a health carrier
after June 30, 2026.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "conscience" means religious,
moral, or ethical beliefs or principles.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "health care service" means any
health care related service, treatment, or procedure to maintain,
diagnose, or treat an individual's physical or mental condition. The
term includes a patient referral for a health care service.
Sec. 4. (a) As used in this chapter, "health carrier" means an
entity:
(1) that is subject to this title and the administrative rules
adopted under this title; and
(2) that enters into a contract to:
(A) provide health care services;
(B) deliver health care services;
(C) arrange for health care services; or
(D) pay for or reimburse any of the costs of health care
services.
(b) The term includes the following:
(1) An insurer, as defined in IC 27-1-2-3(x), that issues a
policy of accident and sickness insurance, as defined in
IC 27-8-5-1(a).
(2) A health maintenance organization, as defined in
IC 27-13-1-19.
(3) An administrator (as defined in IC 27-1-25-1(a)) that is
licensed under IC 27-1-25.
(4) A state employee health plan offered under IC 5-10-8.
(5) A short term insurance plan (as defined in IC 27-8-5.9-3).
(6) Any other entity that provides a plan of health insurance,
health benefits, or health care services.
(c) The term does not include:
(1) an insurer that issues a policy of accident and sickness
insurance;
(2) a limited service health maintenance organization (as
defined in IC 27-13-34-4); or
(3) an administrator;
that only provides coverage for, or processes claims for, dental or
vision care services.
Sec. 5. (a) Except as required by federal law, but
notwithstanding any other provision of this title, a health carrier
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


may not be required to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for,
reimburse any of the costs of, or refer an individual for a health
care service that violates the health carrier's conscience, as
determined by the health carrier's existing or proposed:
(1) guidelines;
(2) mission statement;
(3) constitution;
(4) bylaws;
(5) articles of incorporation;
(6) regulations; or
(7) other documents.
(b) A health carrier that declines to provide, deliver, arrange
for, pay for, reimburse any of the costs of, or refer an individual
for a health care service described in subsection (a) may not be
held civilly or criminally liable for declining to provide, deliver,
arrange for, pay for, or reimburse any of the costs of a health care
service.
Sec. 6. A health carrier or prospective health carrier may not be
subject to any of the following for declining to provide, deliver,
arrange for, pay for, reimburse any of the costs of, or refer an
individual for a health care service that violates the conscience of
the health carrier or prospective health carrier:
(1) Discrimination.
(2) Denial of, revocation of, or disqualification for:
(A) licensure;
(B) a grant; or
(C) any form of aid, assistance, benefit, or privilege.
(3) Denial of authorization to establish, expand, improve,
acquire, affiliate, or merge with the health carrier.
(4) Criminal or civil liability.
Sec. 7. (a) A person injured by a violation of this chapter may
bring an action against the person that violated this chapter.
(b) It is not a defense in an action under this chapter that a
violation was necessary to prevent additional burden or expense on
a health care provider, a health care entity, an individual, or a
patient.
(c) A person whose rights have been violated by a violation of
this chapter may assert the violation or impending violation as a
claim or defense in a judicial, administrative, or other proceeding.
Sec. 8. A prevailing plaintiff in an action brought under section
7 of this chapter is entitled to the following:
(1) Injunctive relief.
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(2) The greater of:
(A) an amount not to exceed three (3) times the actual
damages sustained; or
(B) liquidated damages of five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(3) Court costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
(4) Any other appropriate relief determined by the court.
SECTION 105. IC 27-8-24-4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) Except as
provided in section 5 of this chapter, every policy or group contract that
provides maternity benefits must provide minimum benefits to a
mother and her newborn child that cover:
(1) a minimum length of postpartum stay at a hospital licensed
under IC 16-21 that is consistent with the minimum postpartum
hospital stay recommended by the American Academy of
Pediatrics and the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists in their Guidelines for Perinatal Care; and
(2) the examinations to the newborn child required under
IC 16-41-17-2. and
(3) the testing of the newborn child required under IC 16-41-6-4.
(b) Payment to a hospital for a test required under IC 16-41-6-4
must be in an amount equal to the hospital's actual cost of performing
the test.
SECTION 106. IC 31-27-9-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.81-2025,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) A licensee shall obtain from the placing
agency or placing parent a statement indicating whether or not the child
has, to the best of the agency's or parent's knowledge, been exposed to
a communicable disease within twenty-one (21) days before the date
of admission.
(b) Each child must receive a health examination by a licensed
professional within ninety-three (93) days before admission, or not later
than twenty-one (21) days after admission. The examination must
include the following:
(1) Health history.
(2) Physical examination.
(3) Vision and hearing screening.
(4) A test for tuberculosis if the last such test is known to be
negative or if there is no record of a test. If the test is positive the
child shall have a diagnostic chest x-ray and other indicated
laboratory tests to determine whether or not the disease is in an
infectious state.
(5) A written statement from the licensed professional that in the
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


professional's opinion there is no health condition that would be
hazardous either to the child or to other children in the licensee's
care.
(6) A statement of the medical findings, including physical
defects and need for dental care, state of development, and ability
of the child to take part in group activities, or a schedule of
permitted activities if activities need to be limited.
(7) A health examination, including a tuberculosis screen
annually and a tuberculosis test whenever there is reason to
suspect that the child may have a condition hazardous or
potentially hazardous to others or whenever the child's general
condition indicates the need for an examination.
(c) Each child must receive a dental examination from a licensed
dentist as follows:
(1) Within forty-five (45) days of admission unless the child
caring institution has documentation of a dental examination
within the one hundred eighty-five (185) days before admission.
(2) Annually.
(3) Whenever an interim condition indicates the need for
examination or treatment.
(d) Any treatment or corrective measures required by the licensed
professional or dentist must be arranged by the licensee, as approved
by a parent, legal guardian, or placing agency.
(e) This subsection does not apply to an emergency shelter or an
emergency shelter group home. A licensee, after attempting to
determine the child's immunization history, shall ensure that each child
has received all immunizations and booster shots which are required
under IC 20-34-4-2(c)(1).
(f) (e) All children must be immunized against routine childhood
diseases unless exempted by a licensed professional's statement.
(g) (f) A child may be exempted from immunizations against routine
childhood diseases upon the good faith religious belief statement of the
parent or guardian.
(h) (g) The adequate immunizing doses and the child's age for
administering each vaccine under subsection (e) must be those
recommended by the Indiana department of health.
(i) (h) Adequate documentation of an immunization history must
consist of one (1) of the following:
(1) A licensed professional's certificate, including the number and
dates of doses administered.
(2) Immunization records forwarded from a school corporation,
including the number and dates of doses administered.
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(3) A record maintained by the parent or guardian showing the
month, day, and year during which each dose of vaccine was
administered.
(j) (i) If a licensed professional certifies in writing that a particular
immunization required under this section is detrimental, or may be
detrimental, to the child's health, the requirements for that particular
immunization are not applicable for that child until the immunization
is found no longer to be detrimental to the child's health.
(k) (j) A licensee shall maintain a health record for each child. The
record must include the following:
(1) Admission and periodic health and dental examination
information.
(2) A licensed professional's written instructions with regard to
special dietary or health care required.
(3) Record of all medications and treatments.
(4) Record of observations and incidents, including accidents,
injuries, or any other condition which may be associated with a
health condition or possible abuse or neglect.
SECTION 107. IC 34-30-2.1-98, AS ADDED BY P.L.105-2022,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 98. IC 9-24-10-4(d) (Concerning a driver
education instructors licensed ophthalmologists, and licensed
optometrists instructor who make reports makes a report concerning
the fitness of the applicant to operate a motor vehicle).
SECTION 108. IC 34-30-2.1-195.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 195.5. IC 16-18-5-5 and
IC 16-18-5-6 (Concerning a health care provider or a health care
entity that declines to provide a health care service that violates the
conscience of the health care provider or health care entity).
SECTION 109. IC 34-30-2.1-246 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 246. IC 16-41-8-5(f) (Concerning a health care
provider who discloses information in compliance with IC 16-41-8-5).
SECTION 110. IC 34-30-2.1-420.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 420.5. IC 27-2-30-5 and
IC 27-2-30-6 (Concerning a health carrier or prospective health
carrier that declines to provide a health care service that violates
the conscience of the health carrier or prospective health carrier).
SECTION 111. IC 34-30-2.1-561 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 561. IC 35-38-1-10.5 (Concerning a person who
makes a report or testifies in court regarding the results of a test for a
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


serious disease performed on an individual convicted of certain
crimes).
SECTION 112. IC 35-31.5-2-138, AS ADDED BY P.L.114-2012,
SECTION 67, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 138. "Forcible felony" means a felony that
involves the use or threat of force against a human being, or in which
there is imminent danger of bodily injury to a human being. The term
includes a felony under IC 35-42-2-1(c)(3).
SECTION 113. IC 35-31.5-2-279.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 279.3. "Right to bodily integrity",
for purposes of IC 35-42-2-1, means the:
(1) inalienable right of a human being to remain whole and
intact as their creator intended; and
(2) right to be free from:
(A) a medical:
(i) procedure;
(ii) test; or
(iii) treatment;
(B) an immunization; or
(C) a prophylaxis not described in clause (A) or (B).
SECTION 114. IC 35-38-1-10.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 10.5. (a) The court:
(1) shall order that a person undergo a screening test for the
human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) if the person is:
(A) convicted of an offense relating to a criminal sexual act
and the offense created an epidemiologically demonstrated
risk of transmission of the human immunodeficiency virus
(HIV); or
(B) convicted of an offense relating to controlled substances
and the offense involved:
(i) the delivery by any person to another person; or
(ii) the use by any person on another person;
of a contaminated sharp (as defined in IC 16-41-16-2) or other
paraphernalia that creates an epidemiologically demonstrated
risk of transmission of HIV by involving percutaneous contact;
and
(2) may order that a person undergo a screening test for a serious
disease (as defined in IC 16-41-8-5) in accordance with
IC 16-41-8-5.
(b) If the screening test required by this section indicates the
presence of antibodies to HIV, the court shall order the person to
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


undergo a confirmatory test.
(c) If the confirmatory test confirms the presence of the HIV
antibodies, the court shall report the results to the Indiana department
of health and require a probation officer to conduct a presentence
investigation to:
(1) obtain the medical record of the convicted person from the
Indiana department of health under IC 16-41-8-1(b)(3); and
(2) determine whether the convicted person had received risk
counseling that included information on the behavior that
facilitates the transmission of HIV.
(d) A person who, in good faith:
(1) makes a report required to be made under this section; or
(2) testifies in a judicial proceeding on matters arising from the
report;
is immune from both civil and criminal liability due to the offering of
that report or testimony.
(e) The privileged communication between a husband and wife or
between a health care provider and the health care provider's patient is
not a ground for excluding information required under this section.
(f) A mental health service provider (as defined in IC 34-6-2.1-123)
who discloses information that must be disclosed to comply with this
section is immune from civil and criminal liability under Indiana
statutes that protect patient privacy and confidentiality.
SECTION 115. IC 35-38-1-10.6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 10.6. (a) The Indiana department of health shall
notify victims of an offense relating to a criminal sexual act or an
offense relating to controlled substances if tests conducted under
section 10.5 of this chapter or IC 16-41-8-5 confirm that the person
tested had antibodies for the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV).
(b) The Indiana department of health shall provide counseling to
persons notified under this section.
SECTION 116. IC 35-42-2-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.148-2024,
SECTION 24, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) As used in this section, "public safety
official" means:
(1) a law enforcement officer, including an alcoholic beverage
enforcement officer;
(2) an employee of a penal facility or a juvenile detention facility
(as defined in IC 31-9-2-71);
(3) an employee of the department of correction;
(4) a probation officer;
(5) a parole officer;
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(6) a community corrections worker;
(7) a home detention officer;
(8) a department of child services employee;
(9) a firefighter;
(10) an emergency medical services provider;
(11) a judicial officer;
(12) a bailiff of any court; or
(13) a special deputy (as described in IC 36-8-10-10.6).
(b) As used in this section, "relative" means an individual related by
blood, half-blood, adoption, marriage, or remarriage, including:
(1) a spouse;
(2) a parent or stepparent;
(3) a child or stepchild;
(4) a grandchild or stepgrandchild;
(5) a grandparent or stepgrandparent;
(6) a brother, sister, stepbrother, or stepsister;
(7) a niece or nephew;
(8) an aunt or uncle;
(9) a daughter-in-law or son-in-law;
(10) a mother-in-law or father-in-law; or
(11) a first cousin.
(c) Except as provided in subsections (d) through (k), a person who
knowingly or intentionally:
(1) touches another person in a rude, insolent, or angry manner;
or
(2) in a rude, insolent, or angry manner places any bodily fluid or
waste on another person; or
(3) causes bodily injury to another person by violating
IC 22-5-9-5 or IC 22-5-9-6;
commits battery, a Class B misdemeanor.
(d) The offense described in subsection (c)(1) or (c)(2) is a Class A
misdemeanor if it:
(1) results in bodily injury to any other person; or
(2) is committed against a member of a foster family home (as
defined in IC 35-31.5-2-139.3) by a person who is not a resident
of the foster family home if the person who committed the offense
is a relative of a person who lived in the foster family home at the
time of the offense.
(e) The offense described in subsection (c)(1) or (c)(2) is a Level 6
felony if one (1) or more of the following apply:
(1) The offense results in moderate bodily injury to any other
person.
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


(2) The offense is committed against a public safety official while
the official is engaged in the official's official duty, unless the
offense is committed by a person detained or committed under
IC 12-26.
(3) The offense is committed against a person less than fourteen
(14) years of age and is committed by a person at least eighteen
(18) years of age.
(4) The offense is committed against a person of any age who has
a mental or physical disability and is committed by a person
having the care of the person with the mental or physical
disability, whether the care is assumed voluntarily or because of
a legal obligation.
(5) The offense is committed against an endangered adult (as
defined in IC 12-10-3-2).
(6) The offense:
(A) is committed against a member of a foster family home (as
defined in IC 35-31.5-2-139.3) by a person who is not a
resident of the foster family home if the person who committed
the offense is a relative of a person who lived in the foster
family home at the time of the offense; and
(B) results in bodily injury to the member of the foster family.
(f) The offense described in subsection (c)(2) is a Level 6 felony if
the person knew or recklessly failed to know that the bodily fluid or
waste placed on another person was infected with hepatitis,
tuberculosis, or human immunodeficiency virus.
(g) The offense described in subsection (c)(1), or (c)(2), or (c)(3) is
a Level 5 felony if one (1) or more of the following apply:
(1) The offense results in serious bodily injury to another person.
(2) The offense is committed with a deadly weapon.
(3) The offense results in bodily injury to a pregnant woman if the
person knew of the pregnancy.
(4) The person has a previous conviction for a battery or
strangulation offense included in this chapter against the same
victim.
(5) The offense results in bodily injury to one (1) or more of the
following:
(A) A public safety official while the official is engaged in the
official's official duties, unless the offense is committed by a
person detained or committed under IC 12-26.
(B) A person less than fourteen (14) years of age if the offense
is committed by a person at least eighteen (18) years of age.
(C) A person who has a mental or physical disability if the
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


offense is committed by an individual having care of the
person with the disability, regardless of whether the care is
assumed voluntarily or because of a legal obligation.
(D) An endangered adult (as defined in IC 12-10-3-2).
(6) The offense constitutes a violation of the right to bodily
integrity.
(h) The offense described in subsection (c)(2) is a Level 5 felony if:
(1) the person knew or recklessly failed to know that the bodily
fluid or waste placed on another person was infected with
hepatitis, tuberculosis, or human immunodeficiency virus; and
(2) the person placed the bodily fluid or waste on a public safety
official, unless the offense is committed by a person detained or
committed under IC 12-26.
(i) The offense described in subsection (c)(1) or (c)(2) is a Level 4
felony if it results in serious bodily injury to an endangered adult (as
defined in IC 12-10-3-2).
(j) The offense described in subsection (c)(1) or (c)(2) is a Level 3
felony if it results in serious bodily injury to a person less than fourteen
(14) years of age if the offense is committed by a person at least
eighteen (18) years of age.
(k) The offense described in subsection (c)(1) or (c)(2) is a Level 2
felony if it results in the death of one (1) or more of the following:
(1) A person less than fourteen (14) years of age if the offense is
committed by a person at least eighteen (18) years of age.
(2) An endangered adult (as defined in IC 12-10-3-2).
SECTION 117. IC 35-52-16-40 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 40. IC 16-41-5-3 defines a crime concerning
communicable diseases.
SECTION 118. IC 35-52-16-41 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 41. IC 16-41-6-3 defines a crime concerning
communicable diseases.
SECTION 119. IC 35-52-16-45 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 45. IC 16-41-8-5 defines a crime concerning
communicable diseases.
SECTION 120. IC 35-52-16-46 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 46. IC 16-41-9-1.5 defines a crime concerning
communicable diseases.
SECTION 121. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) Before December
31, 2026, the Indiana department of health shall amend rules
affected by IC 16-42-5.3-1, IC 16-42-5.3-3, IC 16-42-5.3-7, and
IC 16-42-5.3-12, all as amended by this act, and IC 16-42-5.3-10.5,
as added by this act, to comply with the amendments to those
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147


sections.
(b) This SECTION expires January 1, 2027.
2026 IN 174—LS 6614/DI 147